Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB756.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "applicant" and "fantasy contest" in section 302 of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person who, on [his] the person's own behalf or on behalf of another, is applying for [permission to engage in any act or activity which is regulated under the provisions of] a registration, permit, certification, license, qualification or other credential issued by the board pursuant to this chapter. If the applicant is a person other than an individual, the board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *"Fantasy contest." As follows:(1) An online fantasy or simulated game or contest, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839 between participants and not a licensed operator, with an entry fee and a prize or award in which:(i) The precise value of all prizes or awards offered to winning participants is established and made known to participants [in advance of] prior to accepting any entries into the contest and the value is not determined by the number of participants or the amount of any fees paid by those participants.(i.1) The establishment of all prizes or awards do not include the creation of a prize pool wherein the money in the prize pool is likely to be divided between a number of winning participants in amounts unknown until the contest is concluded.(i.2) The maximum number of participants allowed to enter into the contest is clearly disclosed and subject to limitations established by the board.(ii) All winning outcomes [reflect the relative knowledge and skill of participants and] are determined only by accumulated statistical results of the performance of individuals[, including athletes in the case of sports events] and nothing else.(ii.1) The winning outcomes are determined by the number of times a participant correctly picks whether an individual's performance exceeds or fails to exceed a predetermined threshold or similar selection secondary to an individual's accumulated statistical results.(iii) No winning outcome is based on the score, point spread or performance of a single actual team or combination of teams or solely on a single performance of an individual athlete or player in a single actual event.20250SB0756PN0796 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term does not include social fantasy contests.* * *Section 2. Sections 311(b)(7.1), (7.2) and (10), 326(a)(12)(iii) and 1102(1) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 311. General and specific powers of board.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the following specific powers:* * *(7.1) To require prospective and existing employees of the board, independent contractors of the board, applicants and licensees to submit [to fingerprinting by] fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police [or an authorized agent of the Pennsylvania State Police]. The Pennsylvania State Police [or authorized agent of the Pennsylvania State Police] shall conduct a State record check and submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes or verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.(7.2) To require prospective and existing employees of the board, independent contractors of the board, applicants and licensees to submit photographs consistent with the standards established by the board.* * *[(10) To require licensed operators, except for a licensed operator operating season-long fantasy contests that generate less than $250,000 in season-long fantasy contest adjusted revenue, unless the board determines otherwise, to:(i) contract with a certified public accountant to conduct an annual independent audit in accordance with 20250SB0756PN0796 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standards adopted by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants to verify compliance with the provisions of this chapter and board regulations;(ii) contract with a testing laboratory approved by the board to annually verify compliance with the provisions of this chapter and board regulations; and(iii) annually submit to the board and department a copy of the audit report required by subparagraph (i) and submit to the board a copy of the report of the testing laboratory required by subparagraph (ii).]* * *§ 326. Prohibitions.(a) General rule.--No licensed operator may:* * *(12) offer a fantasy contest where:* * *[(iii) the winning outcome does not reflect the relative knowledge and skill of participants;]* * *§ 1102. Legislative intent.The General Assembly recognizes the following public policy purposes and declares that the following objectives of the Commonwealth are to be served by this part:(1) The primary objective of this part to which all other objectives and purposes are secondary is to protect the public through the regulation and policing of all activities involving gaming and practices that continue to be unlawful. It is the intent of the General Assembly to occupy the field of gaming in this Commonwealth and to prohibit all forms of gaming, wagering and gambling in this Commonwealth, including 20250SB0756PN0796 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all traditional, electronic and mobile formats, that have not been expressly authorized by statute.* * *Section 3. The definitions of "applicant," "background investigation," "cash equivalent," "conduct of gaming," "interactive game," "interactive gaming," "interactive gaming operator," "interactive gaming website," "nongaming service provider" and "slot machine" in section 1103 of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Applicant." [Any] A person who, on [his] the person's own behalf or on behalf of another, is applying for [permission to engage in any act or activity which is regulated under the provisions of] a registration, permit, certification, license, qualification or other credential issued by the board pursuant to this part. In cases in which the applicant is a person other than an individual, the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *"Background investigation." A security, criminal, credit and suitability investigation of a person as provided for in this part. The investigation shall include the status of taxes owed [to the United States and] to the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.* * *20250SB0756PN0796 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cash equivalent." [An asset that is readily convertible to cash, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) Chips or tokens.(2) Travelers checks.(3) Foreign currency and coin.(4) Certified checks, cashier's checks and money orders.(5) Personal checks or drafts.(6) A negotiable instrument applied against credit extended by a certificate holder, an interactive gaming certificate holder, an interactive gaming operator or a financial institution.(6.1) A prepaid access instrument.(7) Any other instrument or representation of value that the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board deems a cash equivalent.] A ticket, token, chip, card or other similar instrument or representation of more than nominal value that the board deems a cash equivalent in accordance with this part.* * *"Conduct of gaming." The [licensed] placement, operation and play of slot machines, table games and interactive games and casino simulcasting under this part[, as authorized and approved by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board]. The term shall include the licensed placement, operation and play of authorized interactive games through the use of multi-use computing devices at a qualified airport under Subchapter B.1 of Chapter 13B (relating to multi-use computing devices).* * *"Interactive game." Any [gambling] game offered through the use of communications technology that allows a person, utilizing 20250SB0756PN0796 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money, checks, electronic checks, electronic transfers of money, credit cards or any other instrumentality to transmit electronic information to assist in the placement of a bet or wager and corresponding information related to the display of the game, game outcomes or other similar information. The term shall not include:(1) A lottery game or Internet instant game as defined in the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(2) iLottery under Chapter 5 (relating to lottery).(3) A nongambling game that does not otherwise require a license under the laws of this Commonwealth.(4) A fantasy contest under Chapter 3 (relating to fantasy contests)."Interactive gaming." The placing of wagers [with an interactive gaming certificate holder or interactive gaming operator] using a computer network of both Federal and non-Federal interoperable packet switched data networks through which [an interactive gaming certificate holder] a person may offer [authorized] interactive games to [registered] players. The term shall include the placing of wagers through the use of a multi-use computing device.* * *"Interactive gaming operator." A person [licensed by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board to operate interactive gaming or an interactive gaming system on behalf of an interactive gaming certificate holder. The term shall include a person that has received conditional authorization under section 13B14 (relating to interactive gaming operators) for so long as such authorization is effective] who operates or conducts interactive 20250SB0756PN0796 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gaming.* * *"Interactive gaming website." The interactive gaming skin or skins through which an interactive gaming certificate holder or interactive gaming operator makes [authorized] interactive games available for play.* * *"Nongaming service provider." A person that is not a gaming service provider or required to be licensed as a manufacturer, supplier, management company or gaming junket enterprise under this part and that provides goods or services[:(1)] to a slot machine licensee or applicant for a slot machine license for use in the operation of a licensed facility[; and(2) that does not require access to the gaming floor or a gaming-related restricted area].* * *"Slot machine."(1) The term includes:(i) Any mechanical, electrical or computerized contrivance, terminal, machine or other device [approved by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board] which, upon insertion of a coin, bill, ticket, token or similar object therein or upon payment of any consideration whatsoever, including the use of any electronic payment system except a credit card or debit card, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, whether by reason of skill or application of the element of chance or both:(A) May deliver or entitle the person or persons 20250SB0756PN0796 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 playing or operating the contrivance, terminal, machine or other device to receive cash, billets, tickets, tokens or electronic credits to be exchanged for cash or to receive merchandise or anything of value whatsoever, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or manually.(B) May utilize spinning reels or video displays or both.(C) May or may not dispense coins, tickets or tokens to winning patrons.(D) May use an electronic credit system for receiving wagers and making payouts.(ii) Associated equipment necessary to conduct the operation of the contrivance, terminal, machine or other device.(iii) A skill slot machine, hybrid slot machine and the devices or associated equipment necessary to conduct the operation of a skill slot machine or hybrid slot machine.(iv) A slot machine used in a multistate wide-area progressive slot machine system and devices and associated equipment as defined by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board through regulations.(v) A multi-use computing device which is capable of simulating, either digitally or electronically, a slot machine.(2) The term does not include a fantasy contest terminal within the meaning of Chapter 3.* * *Section 4. Section 1201(i)(1) of Title 4 is amended to read:20250SB0756PN0796 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1201. Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established.* * *(i) Compensation.--(1) [The Executive Board as established in the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, shall establish the compensation of the members.] Compensation for members shall be $70,000 annually.* * *Section 5. Section 1202(b) of Title 4 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1202. General and specific powers.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the specific power and duty:* * *(39) To annually review any required compliance reports and eliminate reports that the board determines to be unnecessary or duplicative.Section 6. Sections 1202.1(c)(5), 1205(b)(2), 1207(4), (13), (19) and (26), 1210(a)(2), 1211(d.1) and (d.3) and 1213(4)(ii) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1202.1. Code of conduct.* * *(c) Restrictions.--In addition to the other prohibitions contained in this part, a member shall:* * *(5) Not hold or campaign for public office, hold an office in any political party or political committee, [as defined in section 1513(d) (relating to political influence),] contribute to or solicit contributions to a 20250SB0756PN0796 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 political campaign, political party, political committee or candidate, publicly endorse a candidate or actively participate in a political campaign.* * *§ 1205. License or permit application hearing process; public input hearings.* * *(b) Public input hearing requirement.--* * *[(2) All public input hearings under paragraph (1) shall be held in the municipality where the licensed facility will be, or is, located and shall be organized in cooperation with the municipality.]* * *§ 1207. Regulatory authority of board.The board shall have the power and its duties shall be to:* * *(4) Require that each licensed entity provide to the board its audited annual financial statements, with such additional detail as the board from time to time shall require, which information shall be submitted not later than [90] 180 days after the end of the licensee's fiscal year.* * *[(13) Require slot machine licensees to provide onsite facilities for use by the board and other appropriate persons for the purpose of carrying out their respective responsibilities under this part.]* * *(19) Authorize an employee of the board to approve, deny or condition a request to decrease the number of slot 20250SB0756PN0796 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 machines in operation at a licensed facility. An employee may not approve a requested decrease in the number of slot machines under this paragraph if the requested decrease exceeds 2% of the total number of slot machines in operation at a licensed facility. [Except as provided under paragraph (20), at no time shall the number of slot machines in operation at a Category 1 or Category 2 licensed facility be less than 1,500 or less than 250 slot machines at a Category 3 licensed facility.]* * *(26) Negotiate and enter into interactive gaming reciprocal agreements on behalf of the Commonwealth to govern the conduct of interactive gaming between interactive gaming certificate holders in this Commonwealth and gaming entities in other states or jurisdictions. Notwithstanding any provision of this part, wagers may be accepted in accordance with this part and regulations of the board from persons in other states or jurisdictions and wagers from persons in this Commonwealth may be made through an interactive gaming platform to a state or jurisdiction with which the Commonwealth has an interactive gaming reciprocal agreement if the board determines that such wagering is not inconsistent with Federal law or the law of the state or jurisdiction in which the person or gaming entity is located, or such wagering is conducted pursuant to an interactive gaming reciprocal agreement to which this Commonwealth is a party that is not inconsistent with Federal law. The board[, with the approval of the Governor,] is hereby designated as the agency of the Commonwealth with the power and authority to enter into interactive gaming reciprocal agreements with 20250SB0756PN0796 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other states or jurisdictions.* * *§ 1210. Number of slot machines.(a) Initial complement.--Except as provided for Category 3 slot machine licensees under section 1305 (relating to Category 3 slot machine license) or a Category 4 slot machine licensee under section 1305.1 (relating to Category 4 slot machine license), the following apply:* * *[(2) Each slot machine licensee shall be required to operate and make available to play a minimum of 1,500 slot machines at its licensed facility within one year of the issuance by the board of a slot machine license to the slot machine licensee. The board, upon application and for good cause shown, may grant an extension for an additional period ending on the later of 36 months from the end of the initial one-year period or December 31, 2012.]* * *§ 1211. Reports of board.* * *(d.1) Impact of interactive gaming.--[(1)] Commencing one year after the issuance of the first interactive gaming certificate and continuing annually thereafter, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency shall prepare and distribute a report to the Governor and the standing committees of the General Assembly with jurisdiction over the board on the impact of interactive gaming on compulsive and problem gambling and gambling addiction in this Commonwealth. The report shall be prepared by a private organization or entity with expertise in serving 20250SB0756PN0796 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and treating the needs of persons with compulsive gambling addictions, which organization or entity shall be selected by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency. The report may be prepared and distributed in coordination with the board. Any costs associated with the preparation and distribution of the report shall be borne by all interactive gaming certificate holders. The board shall be authorized to assess a fee against each interactive gaming certificate holder for these purposes.[(2) Commencing one year after the issuance of the first interactive gaming certificate and continuing annually thereafter, the board shall prepare and distribute a report to the Governor and the standing committees of the General Assembly with the jurisdiction over the board on the impact of interactive gaming on licensed gaming entities in this Commonwealth.]* * *[(d.3) Study.--The board shall study and annually report to the standing committees of the General Assembly with jurisdiction over the board on developments in gaming technology and the impact, if any, new technologies and expansion of gaming are having or are expected to have on the sustainability and competitiveness of the gaming industry in this Commonwealth. The initial report shall be due one year after the effective date of this subsection. Each report shall specifically address the following:(1) Awareness and growth, to the extent known, of any unregulated commercial gaming products, such as e-Sports and other such digital-based computer or video technology.(2) New gaming products, if any, which have been 20250SB0756PN0796 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 introduced in other states or jurisdictions.(3) Any gaming products which the board may authorize pursuant to its regulatory authority under this part.(4) Any legislative or administrative concerns regarding traditional, new or emerging gaming technologies with recommendations regarding resolution of such concerns.(5) Any cannibalization from Category 4 slot machine licensees on Category 1, Category 2 or Category 3 slot machine licensees.]* * *§ 1213. License or permit prohibition.The following apply:* * *(4) For purposes of this section, a felony offense is any of the following:* * *(ii) An offense which, under the laws of another jurisdiction, is[:(A) classified as a felony; or(B)] punishable by imprisonment for more than five years.* * *Section 7. Section 1305.1(d) of Title 4 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1305.1. Category 4 slot machine license.* * *(d) Number of slot machines.--The following apply:(1) [Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), a] A Category 4 slot machine licensee may operate not fewer than 300 and not more than [750] 1,000 slot machines at the Category 4 20250SB0756PN0796 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensed facility.[(2) A Category 1 or Category 2 slot machine licensee who is a Category 4 slot machine licensee may not operate slot machines above the authorized complement under section 1210 (relating to number of slot machines).(3) (i) A Category 3 slot machine licensee who is a Category 4 slot machine licensee may submit a petition to operate slot machines above the Category 3 authorized complement under section 1305 (relating to Category 3 slot machine license).(ii) No later than 60 days after the board approves a petition to operate slot machines above the Category 3 authorized complement in accordance with subparagraph (i), the Category 3 slot machine licensee shall pay a nonrefundable authorization fee in the amount of $10,000 per authorized additional slot machine.(iii) A qualified entity who is a Category 4 slot machine licensee shall submit to the board a petition to operate slot machines not to exceed the limit under paragraph (1). No later than 60 days after the board approves a petition to operate slot machines at a Category 4 licensed facility, the qualified entity must pay a nonrefundable authorization fee in the amount of $10,000 per authorized slot machine.(4) A slot machine licensee may not reduce the number of slot machines and table games in operation at a Category 1, Category 2 or Category 3 licensed facility, as of the effective date of this section, unless the board approves of a reduction and the reduction is not a result of the conduct of gaming at a Category 4 licensed facility.]20250SB0756PN0796 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) A Category 4 slot machine licensee may submit to the board a petition to operate additional slot machines not to exceed the limit under paragraph (1). No later than 60 days after the board approves a petition to operate additional slot machines at a Category 4 licensed facility, the slot machine licensee must pay a nonrefundable authorization fee in the amount of $10,000 per authorized slot machine.* * *(h) Remote video surveillance.--A Category 4 licensed facility that is also a Category 1, Category 2 or Category 3 licensed facility may utilize remote video surveillance of slot machines located at the Category 4 licensed facility by surveillance located at the Category 1, Category 2 or Category 3 licensed facility.Section 8. Sections 1312 and 1317.1(b)(1) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1312. Divestiture of disqualifying applicant.In the event that any [slot machine] license application is not approved by the board based on a finding that an individual who is a principal or has an interest in the person applying for the license does not meet the character requirements [of section 1310 (relating to slot machine license application character requirements)] under this part or any of the eligibility requirements under this part, or a person who purchases a controlling interest in a licensed gaming entity in violation of section 1328 (relating to change in ownership or control of slot machine licensee), the board may afford the individual the opportunity to completely divest his interest in the person, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company seeking the license and, after such divestiture, reconsider the person's 20250SB0756PN0796 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or applicant's suitability for licensure in an expedited proceeding and may, after such proceeding, issue the person or applicant a [slot machine] license. The board shall approve the terms and conditions of any divestiture under this section. Under no circumstances shall any divestiture be approved by the board if the compensation for the divested interest exceeds the cost of the interest.§ 1317.1. Manufacturer licenses.* * *(b) Requirements.--An application for a manufacturer license shall be on the form required by the board, accompanied by the application fee, and shall include all of the following:(1) The name and business address of the applicant and the applicant's affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies; the principals and key employees of each business; and a list of employees and their positions within each business, as well as any financial information from the most recent tax year as required by the board.* * *Section 9. Section 1317.2(a) of Title 4 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1317.2. Gaming service provider.[(a) Development of classification system.--The board shall develop a classification system governing the certification, registration and regulation of gaming service providers and individuals and entities associated with them. The classification system shall be based upon the following:(1) The monetary value or amount of business conducted or expected to be conducted by the gaming service provider with an applicant for a slot machine license or a slot 20250SB0756PN0796 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 machine licensee in any consecutive 12-month period.(2) Whether the employees of the gaming service provider will have access to the gaming floor or any gaming-related restricted area of a licensed facility.(3) The board's analysis of the goods or services provided or to be provided by the gaming service provider.](a.1) Slot machine licensee thresholds.-- (1) A slot machine licensee that contracts with or otherwise engages in business with a gaming service provider in an aggregate amount that is less than $50,000 in any consecutive 12-month period shall provide notification to the board prior to the gaming service provider's provision of goods or services.(2) A slot machine licensee that contracts with or otherwise engages in business with a gaming service provider in an aggregate amount that is between $50,001 and $250,000 in any consecutive 12-month period shall ensure that the gaming service provider is registered with the board prior to the gaming service provider's provision of goods or services.(3) A slot machine licensee that contracts with or otherwise engages in business with a gaming service provider in an aggregate amount that is between $250,001 and $750,000 in any consecutive 12-month period shall ensure that the gaming service provider has obtained a certificate from the board prior to the gaming service provider's provision of goods or services.(4) The thresholds under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) shall be adjusted annually by the board by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware 20250SB0756PN0796 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect.* * *Section 10. Section 1317.3(a) and (d)(3) and (4) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1317.3. Nongaming service provider.(a) Notification required.--(1) A slot machine licensee or applicant for a slot machine license that contracts with or otherwise engages in business in an aggregate amount that exceeds $500,000 in any consecutive 12-month period with a nongaming service provider shall provide notification to the board prior to[:(i)] the nongaming service provider's provision of goods or services. [at the slot machine licensee's licensed facility; or(ii) the provision of goods or services for use in the operation of the slot machine licensee's licensed facility.(2) Notification under this section shall be on a form and in a manner as determined by the board. The board may impose a fee, not to exceed $100, in connection with the notification.](3) The threshold under paragraph (1) shall be adjusted annually by the board by applying the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been 20250SB0756PN0796 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect.* * *(d) Conditions.--A slot machine licensee or applicant for a slot machine license that contracts or otherwise engages in business with a nongaming service provider shall be subject to the following conditions:* * *[(3) The slot machine licensee or applicant for a slot machine license shall ensure that employees of the nongaming service provider do not enter the gaming floor or a gaming-related restricted area while providing the goods or services described in subsection (b)(2).(4) The slot machine licensee or applicant for a slot machine license shall report to the board an employee of a nongaming service provider that does any of the following:(i) Enters the gaming floor or a gaming-related restricted area of the licensed facility.(ii) Commits an act that adversely affects the public interest or integrity of gaming.]* * *Section 11. Section 1318(a) and (b)(3) of Title 4 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1318. Occupation permit application.(a) Application.--Any person who desires to be a gaming employee and has a bona fide offer of employment from a licensed gaming entity shall apply to the board for an occupation permit. The board, in the board's discretion, may issue a temporary 20250SB0756PN0796 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupation permit after the submission of an application that allows a person to be employed as a gaming employee before the issuance of the person's occupation permit. A person may not be employed as a gaming employee unless and until that person holds an appropriate occupation permit or temporary occupation permit issued under this section. [The board may promulgate regulations to reclassify a category of nongaming employees or gaming employees upon a finding that the reclassification is in the public interest and consistent with the objectives of this part.](b) Requirements.--The application for an occupation permit shall include, at a minimum:* * *(3) The criminal history record of the person, as well as the person's consent for the Pennsylvania State Police to conduct a [background investigation.] criminal history record information check provided by the Pennsylvania Access to Criminal History system.* * *(d) Nongaming position.-- An applicant for a position categorized as nongaming shall not be required to obtain an occupation permit.Section 12. Section 1320(b.1)(8) of Title 4 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1320. Slot machine testing and certification standards.* * *(b.1) Use of private testing and certification facilities.--Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or regulation of the board, if a slot machine is tested and certified by a private testing and certification facility registered with the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board, the board shall use an abbreviated certification process requiring only that information determined by it to be necessary to consider the issuance of a slot machine certification under this section. Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the board shall promulgate regulations that:* * *[(8) Require slot machines submitted for abbreviated certification to be approved or denied by the board within 30 days from the date of submission to the board. If the board fails to act within the 30-day period, the abbreviated certification shall be deemed conditionally approved.](8.1) Require that if a slot machine has been approved by another state gaming regulator that has offered slot machines in that state for at least 10 years, upon filing, the slot machine shall be conditionally approved and, after 90 days, shall be deemed finally approved with the licensee holding the board harmless for any resulting liability.* * *Section 13. Sections 1322(c) introductory paragraph, 1325(d)(3), 1326(a) and 13A02(1) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1322. Slot machine accounting controls and audits.* * *(c) Internal control.--Each slot machine license applicant shall submit to the board and department, in such manner as the board shall require, a description of its administrative and accounting procedures in detail, including its written system of internal control that shall be deemed approved upon filing subject to modifications requested by the board. Each written system of internal control shall include:* * *20250SB0756PN0796 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1325. License or permit issuance.* * *(d) Trusts and similar business entities.--The board shall determine the eligibility of a trust or similar business entity to be a licensed entity in accordance with the following:* * *(3) No trust or similar business entity may hold any beneficial interest in a licensed entity unless the board determines that the trust or similar business entity is not engaged in any activity or otherwise being used to evade the public protections under this part, including [sections] section 1512 (relating to financial and employment interests) [and 1513 (relating to political influence)].§ 1326. Renewals.(a) Renewal.--All permits, licenses, registrations or certificates issued under this part unless otherwise provided shall be subject to renewal every five years. Nothing in this subsection shall relieve a licensee, permittee or holder of a certificate or registration of the affirmative duty to notify the board of any changes relating to the status of its license, permit, certificate or registration or to any other information contained in the application materials on file with the board. The application for renewal shall be submitted at least [180] 60 days prior to the expiration of the permit, license, registration or certificate and shall include an update of the information contained in the initial and any prior renewal applications and the payment of any renewal fee required by this part. Unless otherwise specifically provided in this part, the amount of any renewal fee shall be calculated by the board to reflect the longer renewal period. A permit, license, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration or certificate for which a completed renewal application and fee, if required, has been received by the board will continue in effect unless and until the board sends written notification to the holder of the permit, license, registration or certificate that the board has denied the renewal of such permit, license, registration or certificate.* * *§ 13A02. Regulatory authority.The board shall promulgate regulations:(1) Establishing standards and procedures for table games and table game devices or associated equipment, including standards distinguishing electronic gaming tables, fully automated electronic gaming tables and traditional gaming tables. The standards and procedures shall provide for any new table games or gaming tables and variations or composites of approved table games or gaming tables, provided the board determines that the new table game, gaming table or any variations or composites or other approved table games or gaming tables are suitable for use after a test or experimental period under the terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. Unless the board determines that the submission contains a technical defect, a new table game, including rules of the table game, shall be deemed conditionally approved by the board upon submission if the new table game or rules have been approved by any other state gaming regulator within the United States that has offered table games for at least 10 years. If the board fails to issue an order approving or denying the new table game or rules within 90 days of submission, the new table game or rules shall be deemed finally approved by operation of law. A 20250SB0756PN0796 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee seeking board approval of a new table game or rules shall hold the board harmless from any liability arising from the play of the new table game or rules prior to final approval.* * *Section 14. Section 13A41(b.1)(8) of Title 4 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 13A41. Table game device and associated equipment testing and certification standards.* * *(b.1) Use of private testing and certification facilities.--Notwithstanding any provision of this part or regulation of the board, if a table game device or associated equipment is tested and certified by a private testing and certification facility registered with the board, the board shall use an abbreviated certification process requiring only that information determined by it to be necessary to consider the issuance of a table game device or associated equipment certification under this section. Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the board shall promulgate regulations that:* * *[(8) Require table game devices and associated equipment submitted for abbreviated certification to be approved or denied by the board within 30 days from the date of submission to the board. If the board fails to act within the 30-day period, the abbreviated certification shall be deemed conditionally approved.](8.1) Require that if a table game has been approved by another state gaming regulator that has offered table games in that state for at least 10 years, upon filing, the table 20250SB0756PN0796 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 game shall be conditionally approved and, after 90 days, shall be deemed finally approved with the licensee holding the board harmless for any resulting liability.* * *Section 15. Sections 13B32(b)(4) and 13B41 heading and (a)(1) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 13B32. Internal, administrative and accounting controls.* * *(b) Filing.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), the procedures and controls may be implemented by an interactive gaming certificate holder upon the filing of the procedures and controls with the board. Each procedure or control submission shall contain both narrative and diagrammatic representations of the system to be utilized and shall include but need not be limited to:* * *(4) Procedures for the registration of players and establishment of interactive gaming accounts to prevent fraud and to assure the identity of the account holder, including a procedure for authenticating the age, identity and physical address of an applicant for an interactive gaming account and whether the applicant is a person prohibited from establishing or maintaining an account under section 13B22 (relating to establishment of interactive gaming accounts).* * *§ 13B41. Interactive skill games, interactive games and interactive gaming devices and associated equipment testing and certification standards.(a) Testing required.--(1) No interactive skill game, interactive game or 20250SB0756PN0796 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interactive gaming device or associated equipment shall be used to conduct interactive gaming unless it has been tested and certified by the board. The board may, in its discretion and for the purpose of expediting the approval process, refer testing to any testing laboratory as approved by the board.* * *Section 16. The definition of "sporting event" in section 13C01 of Title 4 is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 13C01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"E-Sports event." An organized competition in which players compete against each other, individually or as teams, in the play of video games, and the outcome of the game is determined predominantly by the skill of the player not the element of chance.* * *"Sporting event." A professional or collegiate sports or athletic event [or], a motor race event or an e-Sports event.* * *Section 17. Sections 1401(b) and (d) and 1408(c) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1401. Slot machine licensee deposits.* * *[(b) Initial deposit of funds.--Not later than two business days prior to the commencement of slot machine operations by a slot machine licensee, a slot machine licensee shall deposit and maintain the following sums in its account to guarantee the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 payment of funds to the Commonwealth under this part and as security for its obligations under section 1405 (relating to Pennsylvania Race Horse Development Trust Fund):(1) For a Category 1 or Category 2 slot machine licensee, $1,500,000.(2) For a Category 3 slot machine licensee, $1,000,000.(3) For a Category 4 slot machine licensee, $1,250,000.No additional minimum deposit shall be required from a slot machine licensee if a slot machine licensee is granted a table game operation certificate under Chapter 13A (relating to table games).]* * *[(d) Return of funds.--The funds deposited into its account shall not be returned to a slot machine licensee unless the slot machine licensee ceases conducting business under its license and relinquishes all rights to do so in the future. In that case, the balance of funds in the account attributable to such licensee, minus any unpaid amounts due and payable to the Commonwealth under this part or due and payable under section 1405, shall be returned to the licensee.]§ 1408. Transfers from State Gaming Fund.* * *(c) Local law enforcement grants.--(1) Except as provided in subsection (c.1), annually, the sum of $2,000,000 shall be transferred to the board for the purpose of issuing grants to local law enforcement agencies to investigate violations of and enforce laws relating to unlawful gambling in this Commonwealth.(2) Grants awarded under this subsection may also be used by local law enforcement agencies for:20250SB0756PN0796 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Enforcement of criminal laws related to gambling, including, but not limited to, related thefts, unattended children and harassment.(ii) Educational, prevention and diversion programs related to unlawful gambling and crimes related to gambling.(3) For purposes of this subsection, the term "local law enforcement agency" shall include the Pennsylvania State Police when conducting unlawful gambling enforcement and prevention activities in a municipality which does not have a municipal police department and in which the Pennsylvania State Police provide the municipality with primary police coverage.* * *Section 18. Section 1513 of Title 4 is repealed:[§ 1513. Political influence.(a) Contribution restriction.--The following persons shall be prohibited from contributing any money or in-kind contribution to a candidate for nomination or election to any public office in this Commonwealth, or to any political party committee or other political committee in this Commonwealth or to any group, committee or association organized in support of a candidate, political party committee or other political committee in this Commonwealth:(1) An applicant for a slot machine license, manufacturer license, supplier license, principal license, key employee license, interactive gaming license or horse or harness racing license.(2) A slot machine licensee, licensed manufacturer, licensed supplier, interactive gaming operator or licensed 20250SB0756PN0796 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 racing entity.(3) A licensed principal or licensed key employee of a slot machine licensee, licensed manufacturer, licensed supplier, interactive gaming operator or licensed racing entity.(4) An affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of a slot machine licensee, licensed manufacturer, licensed supplier, interactive gaming operator or licensed racing entity.(5) A licensed principal or licensed key employee of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of a slot machine licensee, licensed manufacturer, licensed supplier, interactive gaming operator or licensed racing entity.(6) A person who holds a similar gaming license in another jurisdiction and the affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries, holding companies, principals or key employees thereof.(a.1) Contributions to certain associations and organizations barred.--The individuals prohibited from making political contributions under subsection (a) shall not make a political contribution of money or an in-kind contribution to any association or organization, including a nonprofit organization, that has been solicited by, or knowing that the contribution or a portion thereof will be contributed to, the elected official, executive-level public employee or candidate for nomination or election to a public office in this Commonwealth.(a.2) Internet website.--(1) The board shall establish an Internet website that 20250SB0756PN0796 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 includes a list of all applicants for and holders of a slot machine license, manufacturer license, supplier license or racing entity license, and the affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries, holding companies, principals and key employees thereof, all persons holding a similar gaming license in another jurisdiction, and the affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries, holding companies, principals and key employees thereof, and any other entity in which the applicant or licensee has any debt or equity security or other ownership or profits interest. An applicant or licensee shall notify the board within seven days of the discovery of any change in or addition to the information. The list shall be published semiannually in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) An individual who acts in good faith and in reliance on the information on the Internet website shall not be subject to any penalties or liability imposed for a violation of this section.(3) The board shall request the information required under paragraph (1) from persons licensed in another jurisdiction who do not hold a license in this Commonwealth and from regulatory agencies in the other jurisdiction. If a licensee in another jurisdiction refuses to provide the information required under paragraph (1), the person and its officers, directors or persons with a controlling interest shall be ineligible to receive any license under this part.(b) Annual certification.--The chief executive officer, or other appropriate individual, of each applicant for a slot machine license, manufacturer license or supplier license, licensed racing entity, licensed supplier, licensed manufacturer or licensed gaming entity shall annually certify under oath to 20250SB0756PN0796 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board and the Department of State that such applicant or licensed racing entity, licensed supplier, licensed manufacturer or licensed gaming entity has developed and implemented internal safeguards and policies intended to prevent a violation of this provision and that such applicant or licensed racing entity or licensed gaming entity has conducted a good faith investigation that has not revealed any violation of this provision during the past year.(c) Penalties.--(1) The first violation of this section by a licensed gaming entity or any person that holds a controlling interest in such gaming entity, or a subsidiary company thereof, or any officer, director or management-level employee of such licensee shall be punishable by a fine equal to an amount not less than the average single day's gross terminal revenue and gross table game revenue of the licensed gaming entity; a second violation of this section, within five years of the first violation, shall be punishable by at least a one-day suspension of the license held by the licensed gaming entity and a fine equal to an amount not less than two times the average single day's gross terminal revenue and gross table game revenue of the licensed gaming entity; a third violation of this section within five years of the second violation shall be punishable by the immediate revocation of the license held by the licensed gaming entity. Following revocation, the board shall consider appointing a trustee in accordance with section 1332 (relating to appointment of trustee).(2) The first violation of this section by a manufacturer or supplier licensed pursuant to this part or by 20250SB0756PN0796 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any person that holds a controlling interest in such manufacturer or supplier, or a subsidiary company thereof, or any officer, director or management-level employee of such a licensee shall be punishable by a fine equal to an amount not less than a single day's average of the gross profit from sales made by the manufacturer or supplier in Pennsylvania during the preceding 12-month period or portion thereof in the event the manufacturer or supplier has not operated in Pennsylvania for 12 months; a subsequent violation of this section within five years of a prior violation shall be punishable by a one-month suspension of the license held by the manufacturer or supplier and a fine equal to an amount not less than two times a single day's average of the gross profit from sales made by the manufacturer or supplier in Pennsylvania during the preceding 12-month period or portion thereof in the event the manufacturer or supplier has not operated in Pennsylvania for 12 months.(3) In no event shall the fine imposed under this section be an amount less than $100,000 for each violation. In addition to any fine or sanction that may be imposed by the board under this subsection, any individual who makes a contribution in violation of this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Contribution." Any payment, gift, subscription, assessment, contract, payment for services, dues, loan, forbearance, advance or deposit of money or any valuable thing made to a candidate or political committee for the purpose of influencing any election 20250SB0756PN0796 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this Commonwealth or for paying debts incurred by or for a candidate or committee before or after any election. The term shall include the purchase of tickets for events including dinners, luncheons, rallies and other fundraising events; the granting of discounts or rebates not available to the general public; or the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all candidates for the same office; and any payments provided for the benefit of any candidate, including payments for the services of a person serving as an agent of a candidate or committee by a person other than the candidate or committee or person whose expenditures the candidate or committee must report. The term also includes any receipt or use of anything of value received by a political committee from another political committee and also includes any return on investments by a political committee."Political committee." Any committee, club, association or other group of persons which receives contributions or makes expenditures.]Section 19. Section 1517(a.2)(1)(iii) and (c)(13) and (14) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1517. Investigations and enforcement.* * *(a.2) Office of Enforcement Counsel.--(1) There is established within the bureau an Office of Enforcement Counsel which shall act as the prosecutor in all noncriminal enforcement actions initiated by the bureau under this part and shall have the following powers and duties:* * *(iii) Initiate, in its sole discretion, proceedings 20250SB0756PN0796 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for noncriminal violations of this part by filing a complaint or other pleading with the board. A complaint or pleading for noncriminal violations of this part shall be commenced within one year of either the occurrence of the violation or of the board's discovery of a violation.* * *(c) Powers and duties of the Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall have the following powers and duties:* * *[(13) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police assigned to duties of enforcement under this part shall not be counted toward the complement as defined in the act of December 13, 2001 (P.L.903, No.100), entitled "An act repealing in part a limitation on the complement of the Pennsylvania State Police."][(14) By March 1 of each year, the Commissioner of the Pennsylvania State Police shall submit a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the Community, Economic and Recreational Development Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives and the Gaming Oversight Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall summarize all law enforcement activities at each licensed facility during the previous calendar year and shall include all of the following:(i) The number of arrests made and citations issued at each licensed facility and the name of the law enforcement agency making the arrest or issuing the citation.20250SB0756PN0796 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) A list of specific offenses charged for each arrest made or citation issued.(iii) The number of criminal prosecutions resulting from arrests made or citations issued.(iv) The number of convictions resulting from prosecutions reported under subparagraph (iii).(v) The number of Pennsylvania State Police troopers assigned to each licensed facility and to the gaming unit at the Pennsylvania State Police headquarters.(vi) The number and the subject matter of complaints made against Pennsylvania State Police troopers in licensed facilities and the type of disciplinary actions taken by the Pennsylvania State Police, if any, against the Pennsylvania State Police troopers.(vii) The closest local police station, Pennsylvania State Police station and regional Pennsylvania State Police headquarters to each licensed facility.]* * *Section 20. Section 1518(c)(1)(vi) of Title 4 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1518. Prohibited acts; penalties.* * *(c) Board-imposed administrative sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the board may impose without limitation the following sanctions upon any licensee or permittee:* * *(vi) Assess administrative penalties as necessary to punish misconduct and to deter future violations[.], which may include fines which shall not exceed $1,000 for 20250SB0756PN0796 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a first violation, $5,000 for a second violation occurring within one year of the first violation and $10,000 for subsequent violations occurring within one year of the first violation.* * *(1.1) A licensee shall not be liable:(i) If the violation is not found to be willful and the licensee acted in accordance with board-approved internal controls.(ii) For a violation committed by another entity that holds a license under this part and the licensee charged with the violation neither knew nor should have known about the conduct at issue.(1.2) If a licensee establishes any of the affirmative defenses under paragraph (1.1), the board's sole remedy against the licensee shall be to require the licensee to correct any internal controls discovered to be inadequate as a result of the violation.* * *Section 21. Sections 1521(b.1) and 1802 of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 1521. Liquor licenses at licensed facilities.* * *(b.1) Liquor Code sanctions.--[Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a] A person holding a slot machine license that also holds a license issued by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board shall not be subject to the provisions of section 471(c) of the Liquor Code. [In addition, if a fine is imposed under section 471(b) of the Liquor Code, it shall be for not less than $250 nor more than $25,000. The prior citation history 20250SB0756PN0796 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the slot machine licensee shall be considered in determining the amount of the fine.]* * *§ 1802. Submission of fingerprints and photographs.Appointees to the board and commission, employees and prospective employees [engaged in the service of the commissions or the board] of the board and commission and applicants under this part shall submit [to fingerprinting and photographing by] fingerprints and photographs to the Pennsylvania State Police [or by a local law enforcement agency capable of submitting fingerprints and photographs electronically to the Pennsylvania State Police] utilizing the [Integrated Automated Fingerprint Identification System] Multi-Biometric Identification System and the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network or in a manner and in such form as may be provided by the Pennsylvania State Police. Fingerprinting pursuant to this part shall require, at a minimum, the submission of a full set of fingerprints. Photographing pursuant to this part shall require submission to photographs of the face and any scars, marks or tattoos for purposes of comparison utilizing an automated biometric imaging system. The Pennsylvania State Police shall conduct a State record check and submit fingerprints when requested by the [commissions] commission or the board to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the applicants and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions in order to prepare criminal history background investigations under section 1801 (relating to duty to provide). Fingerprints and photographs obtained pursuant to this part may be maintained by the [commissions] commission, the board and the Pennsylvania State Police for use pursuant to this part and for 20250SB0756PN0796 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general law enforcement purposes. In addition to any other fee or cost assessed by the [commissions] commission or the board, an applicant shall pay for the cost of fingerprinting and photographing.Section 22. Title 4 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1901.4. Live streaming on casino floor.(a) Live streaming.--A social media influencer may live stream from a gaming floor with advance notice and approval from the board and a licensee.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Social media influencer." An individual who endorses or promotes a product or service through social media in exchange for compensation.Section 23. Section 1902(b) of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 1902. Severability.* * *(b) Limitation.--If [any of] the provisions of section [1201 (relating to Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established) or] 1209 (relating to slot machine license fee) or [their] its application to any person or circumstance are held to be invalid by any court, the remaining provisions of this title and its application shall be void.Section 24. The definitions of "applicant," "background investigation," "establishment licensee," "gaming employee," "manufacturer license," "manufacturer licensee," "terminal operator," "terminal operator licensee," "truck stop establishment" and "video gaming terminal" in section 3102 of Title 4 are amended and the section is amended by adding 20250SB0756PN0796 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions to read:§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Applicant." A person who, on [his] the person's own behalf or on behalf of another, [applies for permission to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this part.] is applying for a registration, permit, certification, license, qualification or other credential issued by the board pursuant to this part. If an applicant is a person other than the individual, the board shall determine the associated persons whose qualifications are necessary as a precondition to the licensing of the applicant.* * *"Background investigation." A security, criminal, credit and suitability investigation of a person as provided for in this part that includes the status of taxes owed to [the United States,] the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions.* * *"Establishment licensee." A truck stop establishment that holds an establishment license under this part.* * *"Gaming employee."(1) Any of the following:(i) An employee of a terminal operator licensee[, establishment licensee] or supplier licensee [that] who is not a key employee and is involved in the conduct of video gaming.20250SB0756PN0796 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) An employee of a supplier licensee whose duties are directly involved with the repair or distribution of video gaming terminals or associated equipment sold or provided to a terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth as determined by the board.(iii) An employee of an establishment licensee who is designated by the establishment licensee as a gaming manager.(2) The term does not include nongaming personnel as determined by the board [or an employee of an establishment licensee]."Gaming manager." A person designated by an establishment licensee as being:(1) responsible for the management, supervision and training of other establishment licensee employees regarding the conduct of video gaming;(2) responsible for coordinating video gaming operations with a terminal operator; and(3) available to promptly address any gaming-related issues that arise at the premises of an establishment licensee.* * *"Manufacturer license." A license issued by the board under this part authorizing a manufacturer to manufacture or produce video gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment for use in this Commonwealth for video gaming purposes."Manufacturer licensee." A person that holds a manufacturer license issued by the board under this part.* * *20250SB0756PN0796 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Skill gaming terminal." As defined in section 5102 (relating to definitions).* * *"Terminal operator." A person that holds a terminal operator license and owns, services or maintains video gaming terminals for placement and operation on the premises of [an establishment licensee] a truck stop establishment licensed by the board under this part.* * *"Terminal operator licensee." A person that holds a terminal operator license issued by the board under this part.* * *"Truck stop establishment." A premises that:(1) Is equipped with diesel islands used for fueling commercial motor vehicles.(2) Has sold on average [50,000] 10,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel or more each month for the previous 12 months or is projected to sell an average of [50,000] 10,000 gallons of diesel or biodiesel fuel or more each month for the next 12 months.(3) Has at least 20 parking spaces dedicated for commercial motor vehicles.(4) Has a convenience store.(5) Is situated on a parcel of land of not less than three acres that the truck stop establishment owns or leases.(6) Is not located on any property owned by the Pennsylvania Turnpike.* * *"Video gaming terminal."(1) A mechanical or electrical contrivance, terminal, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 machine or other device approved by the board that, upon insertion of cash or cash equivalents, is available to play or operate one or more gambling games, the play of which utilizes a random number generator and:(i) May award a winning player either a free game or credit that shall only be redeemable for cash or cash equivalents at a redemption terminal.(ii) May utilize video displays.(iii) May use an electronic credit system for receiving wagers and making payouts that are only redeemable at a redemption terminal.(2) Associated equipment necessary to conduct the operation of the contrivance, terminal, machine or other device.(3) The term does not include a slot machine operated at a licensed facility in accordance with Part II (relating to gaming), a skill gaming terminal or a coin-operated amusement game.(4) The term does not include "lottery" as defined under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.Section 25. Sections 3301(b)(8) and 3505(a) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 3301. Powers of board.* * *(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the power and duty:* * *(8) To require prospective and existing video gaming employees, independent contractors, applicants, permittees 20250SB0756PN0796 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and licensees to submit [to fingerprinting by] fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police [or its authorized designee]. The Pennsylvania State Police [or its authorized designee] shall conduct a State record check and submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.* * *§ 3505. Key employee licenses.(a) License required.--[All key employees] A key employee, including a gaming manager, shall obtain a key employee license from the board.* * *Section 26. Section 3514 of Title 4 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3514. Establishment licenses.* * *(g) Prohibition.--A gaming manager may not be licensed as an employee of more than one establishment licensee.Section 27. Section 3515 of Title 4 is amended to read:§ 3515. License or permit prohibition.The following apply:(1) The board shall be prohibited from granting a license under this part to any applicant who has been convicted of a gambling-related felony offense in any jurisdiction. The board shall determine, in the board's sole discretion, whether a felony offense is gambling-related.[(2) In addition to the prohibition under paragraph (1), the board shall be prohibited from granting the following:(i) A principal license or key employee license to 20250SB0756PN0796 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an individual who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(ii) A gaming employee permit or a license other than a principal license or key employee license to an individual who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(iii) An establishment license to an applicant who has been convicted in a jurisdiction of a misdemeanor gambling offense, unless 15 years have elapsed from the date of conviction for the offense.(3) Following the expiration of any prohibition period applicable to an applicant under paragraph (2), in determining whether to issue a license or permit, the board shall consider the following factors:(i) The nature and duties of the applicant's position with the licensed entity.(ii) The nature and seriousness of the offense or conduct.(iii) The circumstances under which the offense or conduct occurred.(iv) The age of the applicant when the offense or conduct was committed.(v) Whether the offense or conduct was an isolated or a repeated incident.(vi) Evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received and the recommendation of persons who have substantial contact with the applicant.]20250SB0756PN0796 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) For purposes of this section, a felony offense is any of the following:(i) An offense classified as a felony or punishable under the laws of this Commonwealth by imprisonment for more than five years.(ii) An offense which, under the laws of another jurisdiction, is[:(A) classified as a felony; or(B)] punishable by imprisonment for more than five years.(iii) An offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be subject to imprisonment for more than five years.Section 28. Section 3702(a)(1) and (b)(1) and (7) of Title 4 are amended, subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3702. Video gaming limitations.(a) Establishment licensee limitations.--An establishment licensee may offer video gaming terminals for play within its premises, subject to the following:(1) No more than [five] seven video gaming terminals may be placed on the premises of the establishment licensee.* * *(13) An establishment licensee shall employ at least one gaming manager. An establishment licensee shall not be required to have a gaming manager on premises during the conduct of video gaming at the establishment.(b) Terminal operator licensee limitations.--A terminal operator licensee may place and operate video gaming terminals 20250SB0756PN0796 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the premises of an establishment licensee, subject to the following:(1) No more than [five] seven video gaming terminals may be placed on the premises of the establishment licensee.* * *(7) No terminal operator licensee may give an establishment licensee a percentage of gross terminal revenue other than [15%] 18% of the gross terminal revenue of the video gaming terminals operating in the establishment licensee's premises.* * *(c) Construction.--(1) Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the placement of video gaming terminals in a county that has prohibited the placement of video gaming terminals within the host county in accordance with section 5706 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling).(2) Nothing in this part shall be construed to authorize the placement of video gaming terminals in a municipality that has prohibited the placement of video gaming terminals within the municipality in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 502 (relating to municipal option for gaming).Section 29. Sections 3706(d)(1) and (3) and (e) and 3905(b)(4) of Title 4 are amended to read:§ 3706. Compulsive and problem gambling.* * *(d) Mandatory training.--(1) The board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling, in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency, shall develop a 20250SB0756PN0796 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mandatory training program for all employees [and management] of an establishment licensee [who oversee the establishment licensee's video gaming area]. The training program shall address responsible gaming and other compulsive and problem gambling issues related to video gaming terminals.* * *(3) [At least one employee of the establishment licensee who holds a valid occupation permit and has successfully completed the training program shall be located on the premises and supervising the video gaming area during all times video gaming terminals are available for play.] All employees of an establishment licensee shall successfully complete the training program.(e) Penalty.--An establishment licensee that fails to fulfill the requirements of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) shall be assessed by the board an administrative penalty and may have its establishment license suspended. When determining the penalty and number of suspension days, the board shall consider the length of time in which the materials were not available or [a trained employee was not located on the premises] any employee of an establishment licensee was employed without completing the mandatory training as required by subsection (d)(3).§ 3905. Prohibited acts and penalties.* * *(b) Criminal penalties and fines.--* * *(4) An individual who commits an offense in violation of subsection (a)(16) commits a nongambling offense to be graded in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 and shall be subject to 20250SB0756PN0796 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the same penalties imposed pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. [§§ 6308 and 6310.4 (relating to restriction of operating privileges)] § 6308 except that the fine imposed for a violation of subsection (a)(16) shall be not less than $350 nor more than $1,000.* * *Section 30. Section 4101(c) of Title 4 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4101. Fees.* * *(c) Terminal increase fee.--An establishment licensee that increases the total number of video gaming terminals within the establishment [after submission of the renewal fee required in subsection (b)] shall provide the board with a $250 [renewal] fee for each additional video gaming terminal added to the establishment within 60 days of installation of each additional video gaming terminal.(c.1) Terminal increase fee.--A terminal operator licensee shall provide written notice to the board prior to placing a video gaming terminal at a truck stop establishment and shall provide the board with the revised contract or other documentation evidencing the truck stop establishment's agreement and acceptance. Within 60 days of placement, the terminal operator licensee shall pay of fee of $1,000 to the board for each additional video gaming terminal placed. Additional video gaming terminals shall be subject to the same requirements as existing video gaming terminals.* * *Section 31. Section 4305 of Title 4 is repealed:[§ 4305. Political influence.20250SB0756PN0796 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Contribution restriction.--The following persons shall be prohibited from contributing money or an in-kind contribution to a candidate for nomination or election to a public office in this Commonwealth, to a political party committee or other political committee in this Commonwealth or to a group, committee or association organized in support of a candidate, political party committee or other political committee in this Commonwealth:(1) An applicant for a terminal operator license, manufacturer license, supplier license, principal license or a key employee license.(2) A terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(3) A licensed principal or licensed key employee of a terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(4) An affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of a terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(5) A licensed principal or licensed key employee of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of a terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or supplier licensee.(6) A person who holds a similar video gaming license in another jurisdiction and the affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries, holding companies, principals or key employees thereof.(b) Contributions to certain associations and organizations barred.--No individual prohibited from making political contributions under subsection (a) may make a political 20250SB0756PN0796 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contribution of money or an in-kind contribution to an association or organization, including a nonprofit organization, that has been solicited by, or knowing that the contribution or a portion thereof will be contributed to, the elected official, executive-level public employee or candidate for nomination or election to a public office in this Commonwealth.(c) Internet website.--(1) The board shall establish a publicly accessible Internet website that includes a list of all applicants for and holders of a terminal operator license, manufacturer license or supplier license and the affiliates, intermediaries, holding companies, principals and key employees thereof, all persons holding a similar video gaming license in another jurisdiction, and the affiliates, intermediaries, holding companies, principals and key employees thereof, and other entities in which the applicant or licensee has a debt or an equity security or other ownership or profits interest. An applicant or licensee shall notify the board within seven days of the discovery of a change in or addition to the information.(2) No individual who acts in good faith and in reliance on the information on the board's publicly accessible Internet website shall be subject to penalty or liability imposed for a violation of this section.(3) The board shall request the information required under paragraph (1) from a person licensed in another jurisdiction who does not hold a license in this Commonwealth and from regulatory agencies in the other jurisdiction. If a person who is a licensee in another jurisdiction refuses to provide the information required under paragraph (1), the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person and its officers, directors or persons with a controlling interest shall be ineligible to receive a license under this part.(d) Annual certification.--The chief executive officer, or other appropriate individual, of each applicant for a terminal operator license, manufacturer license or supplier license, or manufacturer licensee, supplier licensee or terminal operator licensee, shall annually certify under oath to the board and the Department of State that the applicant or supplier licensee, manufacturer licensee or terminal operator licensee has developed and implemented internal safeguards and policies intended to prevent a violation of this provision and that the applicant or supplier licensee, manufacturer licensee or terminal operator licensee has conducted a good faith investigation that has not revealed a violation of this subsection during the past year.(e) Penalties.--(1) A violation of this section by a terminal operator licensee or a person that holds a controlling interest in the licensee, or a subsidiary company thereof, or an officer, director or management-level employee of the licensee shall be punishable as follows:(i) A first violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine equal to an amount not less than the average single-day gross terminal revenue of the terminal operator licensee.(ii) A second violation of this section, within five years of the first violation, shall be punishable by at least a one-day suspension of the license held by the terminal operator licensee and a fine equal to an amount 20250SB0756PN0796 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not less than two times the average single-day gross terminal revenue of the terminal operator licensee.(iii) A third violation of this section within five years of the second violation shall be punishable by the immediate revocation of the license held by the terminal operator licensee.(2) A violation of this section by a manufacturer or supplier licensed under this part or by a person that holds a controlling interest in such manufacturer or supplier, or a subsidiary company thereof, or an officer, a director or a management-level employee of such a licensee shall be punishable as follows:(i) A first violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine equal to an amount not less than a single-day average of the gross profit from sales made by the manufacturer or supplier in this Commonwealth during the preceding 12-month period or portion thereof in the event the manufacturer or supplier has not operated in this Commonwealth for 12 months.(ii) A second or subsequent violation of this section within five years of a prior violation shall be punishable by a one-month suspension of the license held by the manufacturer or supplier and a fine equal to an amount not less than two times a single-day average of the gross profit from sales made by the manufacturer or supplier in this Commonwealth during the preceding 12-month period or portion thereof in the event the manufacturer or supplier has not operated in this Commonwealth for 12 months.(3) In no event shall the fine imposed under this 20250SB0756PN0796 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section be an amount less than $100,000 for each violation. In addition to a fine or sanction that may be imposed by the board under this subsection, an individual who makes a contribution in violation of this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Contribution." A payment, gift, subscription, assessment, contract, payment for services, dues, loan, forbearance, advance or deposit of money or a valuable thing made to a candidate or political committee for the purpose of influencing an election in this Commonwealth or for paying debts incurred by or for a candidate or committee before or after an election. The term includes:(1) The purchase of tickets for events, including dinners, luncheons, rallies and other fundraising events.(2) The granting of discounts or rebates not available to the general public.(3) The granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all candidates for the same office.(4) A payment provided for the benefit of a candidate, including payment for the services of a person serving as an agent of a candidate or committee by a person other than the candidate or committee or person whose expenditures the candidate or committee must report.(5) The receipt or use of anything of value by a political committee from another political committee and a return on investments by a political committee.20250SB0756PN0796 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Political committee." A committee, club, association or other group of persons that receives contributions or makes expenditures.]Section 32. Title 4 is amended by adding a part to read:PART IVSKILL GAMINGChapter51. General Provisions53. Administration55. Application and Licensure57. Operation59. Enforcement61. Revenues63. Ethics65. Miscellaneous ProvisionsCHAPTER 51GENERAL PROVISIONSSec.5101. Scope of part.5102. Definitions.§ 5101. Scope of part.This part relates to skill gaming terminals.§ 5102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A person who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is 20250SB0756PN0796 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under common control with a specified person."Applicant." A person who, on the person's own behalf or on behalf of another, applies for permission to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this part."Associated equipment." Equipment or a mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with skill gaming terminals or redemption terminals, including replacement parts, hardware and software."Background investigation." A security, criminal, credit and suitability investigation of a person as provided for in this part that includes the status of taxes owed to the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions."Board." The Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established under section 1201 (relating to Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established)."Bureau." The Bureau of Investigations and Enforcement of the board."Cash." United States currency and coin."Cash equivalent." A ticket, token, chip, card or other similar instrument or representation of value that the board deems a cash equivalent in accordance with this part."Central control computer." A central site computer controlled by the department and accessible by the board to which all skill gaming terminals communicate for the purpose of auditing capacity, real-time information retrieval of the details of any financial event that occurs in the operation of a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal, including coin in, coin out, ticket in, ticket out, jackpots, skill gaming terminal and redemption terminal door openings and power failure and 20250SB0756PN0796 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remote skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal activation and disabling of skill gaming terminals or redemption terminals."Cheat." Any of the following:(1) To defraud or steal from a player, terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee or the Commonwealth while operating or playing a skill gaming terminal, including causing, aiding, abetting or conspiring with another person to do so.(2) To alter or causing, aiding, abetting or conspiring with another person to alter the elements of chance, method of selection or criteria that determine:(i) The result of a skill gaming terminal game.(ii) The amount or frequency of payment in a skill gaming terminal game.(iii) The value of a wagering instrument.(iv) The value of a wagering credit.(3) The term does not include altering a skill gaming terminal or associated equipment for maintenance or repair with the approval of a terminal operator licensee and the board."Cheating or thieving device." A device:(1) used or possessed with the intent to be used to cheat during the operation or play of a skill gaming terminal; or(2) used to alter a skill gaming terminal without the terminal operator licensee's and the board's approval."Coin-operated amusement game." A machine that requires the insertion of a coin, currency or token to play or activate a game the outcome of which is predominantly and primarily determined by the skill of the player and does not pay, award or 20250SB0756PN0796 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offer a prize in the form of cash or merchandise. The term does not include a slot machine or hybrid slot machine located at a licensed facility as defined in Part II (relating to gaming), a video gaming terminal located at a truck stop establishment as defined in Part III (relating to video gaming) or a skill gaming terminal as defined in this part."Compensation." Anything of value, money or a financial benefit conferred on or received by a person in return for services rendered or to be rendered whether by the person or another."Complimentary service." A lodging, service or item that is provided to an individual at no cost or at a reduced cost that is not generally available to the public under similar circumstances. Group rates, including convention and government rates, shall be deemed to be generally available to the public."Conduct of skill gaming." The licensed placement, operation and play of skill gaming terminals under this part, as authorized and approved by the board."Controlling interest." Any of the following:(1) For a publicly traded domestic or foreign corporation, the term means a person has a controlling interest in a legal entity, applicant or licensee if a person's sole voting rights under state law or corporate articles or bylaws entitle the person to elect or appoint one or more of the members of the board of directors or other governing board or the person holds an ownership or beneficial holding of 5% or more of the securities of the publicly traded corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of publicly traded legal entity, unless this presumption of control or ability to elect is rebutted 20250SB0756PN0796 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by clear and convincing evidence.(2) For a privately held domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of privately held legal entity, the term means the holding of any securities in the legal entity, unless this presumption of control is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence."Conviction." A finding of guilt or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, whether or not a judgment of sentence has been imposed as determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which the prosecution was held. The term does not include a conviction that has been expunged or overturned or for which an individual has been pardoned or had an order of Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition entered."Corporation." Includes a publicly traded corporation."County quota." The maximum number of skill gaming establishment licenses available in each county in this Commonwealth, which shall be equal to the aggregate number of licenses issued by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board in a county as of the effective date of this definition, limited to liquor licenses in either active or safekeeping status, and limited to the following liquor license categories:(1) Brewery.(2) Brewery pub.(3) Brewery storage.(4) Hotel (liquor).(5) Hotel (malt).(6) Restaurant.(7) Catering club (liquor).(8) Club (liquor).20250SB0756PN0796 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Club (malt).(10) Distributor (malt).(11) Importing distributor (malt).(12) Eating place retail dispenser (malt)."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible establishment" or "eligible skill gaming establishment." A premises that is either:(1) A licensed premises approved by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board for the sale of liquor, alcohol or malt or brewed beverages under any of the following license categories, limited to licenses in either active or safekeeping status:(i) Brewery.(ii) Brewery pub.(iii) Brewery storage.(iv) Hotel (liquor).(v) Hotel (malt).(vi) Restaurant.(vii) Catering club (liquor).(viii) Club (liquor).(ix) Club (malt).(x) Distributor (malt).(xi) Importing distributor (malt).(xii) Eating place retail dispenser (malt).(2) A location authorized to sell Pennsylvania Lottery tickets or shares under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law."Establishment license" or "skill gaming establishment license." A license issued by the board authorizing an eligible skill gaming establishment to enter into a terminal placement 20250SB0756PN0796 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement, thus allowing a terminal operator licensee to place and operate skill gaming terminals on the skill gaming establishment licensee's premises under this part and regulations promulgated under this part."Establishment licensee" or "skill gaming establishment licensee." An eligible skill gaming establishment that holds an establishment license under this part."Executive-level public employee." The term shall include the following:(1) A deputy secretary of the Commonwealth and the Governor's Office executive staff.(2) An employee of the Executive Branch whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement under this part, who has discretionary power that may affect or influence the outcome of a Commonwealth agency's action or decision or who is involved in the development of regulations or policies relating to a licensed entity. The term includes an employee with law enforcement authority.(3) An employee of a county or municipality with discretionary powers that may affect or influence the outcome of the county's or municipality's action or decision related to this part or who is involved in the development of law, regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this part. The term includes an employee with law enforcement authority.(4) An employee of a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with discretionary power that may affect or influence the outcome of the governmental body's action or decision related to this part or who is 20250SB0756PN0796 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this part. The term includes an employee with law enforcement authority."Financial backer." An investor, mortgagee, bondholder, noteholder or other sources of equity or capital provided to an applicant or licensed entity."Gaming employee." Either of the following:(1) An employee of a terminal operator licensee or manufacturer licensee who is not a key employee and who the board determines is involved in the conduct of skill gaming.(2) An employee of an establishment licensee whom the establishment licensee designates as the gaming manager in accordance with this part."Gaming manager." A person designated by an establishment licensee being:(1) responsible for the management, supervision and training of other establishment licensee employees regarding the conduct of video gaming;(2) responsible for coordinating video gaming operations with a terminal operator; and(3) available to promptly address any gaming-related issues that arises at the premises of an establishment licensee."Gaming service provider." A person not required to be licensed as a terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee or establishment licensee and provides goods or services to a terminal operator licensee that the board determines directly relates to the operation and security of a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal. The term shall not include a person that supplies goods or services that, at the discretion of the board, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 does not impact the integrity of skill gaming, skill gaming terminals or the connection of skill gaming terminals to the central control computer system, including, but not limited to:(1) Seating to accompany skill gaming terminals.(2) Structural or cosmetic renovations, improvements or other alterations to a skill gaming area."Gross terminal revenue." The total of cash or cash equivalents received by a skill gaming terminal minus the total of cash or cash equivalents paid out to players as a result of playing a skill gaming terminal. The term does not include counterfeit cash or cash taken in a fraudulent act perpetrated against a terminal operator licensee for which the terminal operator licensee is not reimbursed."Holding company." A person, other than an individual, which, directly or indirectly, owns or has the power or right to control or to vote a significant part of the outstanding voting securities of a corporation or other form of business organization. A holding company indirectly has, holds or owns such power, right or security if it does so through an interest in a subsidiary or successive subsidiaries."Incentive." Consideration, including a promotion or prize, provided to a player or potential player as an enticement to play a skill gaming terminal."Inducement."(1) Any of the following:(i) Consideration paid directly or indirectly, from a manufacturer licensee, terminal operator licensee, procurement agent, gaming employee, employee or another person on behalf of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part, to a skill gaming establishment, establishment 20250SB0756PN0796 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee, establishment licensee owner, gaming manager or an employee of the establishment licensee, directly or indirectly, as an enticement to solicit or maintain the establishment licensee or establishment licensee owner's business.(ii) Cash, incentive, marketing and advertising costs, gift, food, beverage, loan, prepayment of gross terminal revenue and other contribution or payment that offsets an establishment licensee's operational costs, or as otherwise determined by the board.(2) The term does not include costs paid by a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee related to making skill gaming terminals operate at the premises of an establishment licensee, including wiring and rewiring, software updates, ongoing skill gaming terminal maintenance, redemption terminals, network connections, site controllers and costs associated with communicating with the central control computer system."Institutional investor." A retirement fund administered by a public agency for the exclusive benefit of Federal, State or local public employees, an investment company registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. I (relating to investment companies), a collective investment trust organized by banks under Part IX of the Rules of the Comptroller of the Currency, closed-end investment trust, chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company, banking and other chartered or licensed lending institution, an investment advisor registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. II (relating to investment advisers) and any other person as the board may determine consistent with this part.20250SB0756PN0796 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Intermediary." As follows:(1) a holding company with respect to a corporation or other form of business organization, that holds or applies for a license under this part; and(2) a subsidiary with respect to a holding company."Key employee." An individual employed by a manufacturer licensee or a terminal operator licensee who is determined by the board to have primary authority to make decisions regarding the conduct of skill gaming."Law enforcement authority." The power to conduct investigations of or to make arrests for criminal offenses."Licensed entity." A terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee or manufacturer licensee under this part."Licensed entity representative." A person, including an attorney, agent or lobbyist, acting on behalf of or authorized to represent the interest of an applicant, licensee or other person authorized by the board to engage in an act or activity that is regulated under this part regarding a matter before or that may reasonably be expected to come before the board."Licensee." A person licensed under this part."Manufacturer license." A license issued by the board authorizing a person to sell, lease, offer or provide skill gaming terminals and redemption terminals to a terminal operator licensee or an applicant for a terminal operator licensee for use or play in this Commonwealth."Manufacturer licensee." A person that holds a manufacturer license issued by the board under this part."Minor." An individual under 21 years of age."Net terminal revenue." The net amount of the gross terminal revenue less the tax and assessments imposed by section 6102 20250SB0756PN0796 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to taxes and assessments) and the regulatory assessments established in section 6104 (relating to regulatory assessments)."Occupation permit." A permit issued by the board authorizing an individual to be employed or to work as a gaming employee."Party." The bureau or an applicant, licensee, registrant or other person appearing of record in any proceeding before the board."Permittee." A holder of a permit issued under this part."Person." A natural person, corporation, foundation, organization, business trust, estate, limited liability company, trust, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or other form of legal business entity."Player." An individual who inserts cash or cash equivalent in the play or operation of a skill gaming terminal, the play or operation of which may deliver or entitle the player to receive cash or cash equivalent from a terminal operator licensee."Principal." An officer, director, person who directly holds a beneficial interest in or ownership of the securities of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part, person who has a controlling interest in an applicant or anyone licensed under this part or has the ability to elect a majority of the board of directors of a licensee or to otherwise control anyone licensed under this part, procurement agent, lender or other licensed financial institution of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part, other than a bank or lending institution which makes a loan or holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business, underwriter of an applicant or anyone licensed under this part or other person or employee of 20250SB0756PN0796 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an applicant, terminal operator licensee, manufacturer licensee deemed to be a principal by the board, including a procurement agent."Procurement agent." A person that shares in the gross terminal revenue or is otherwise compensated for the purpose of soliciting or procuring a terminal placement agreement."Publicly traded corporation." A person, other than an individual, that:(1) has a class or series of securities registered under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2B (relating to securities exchanges);(2) is a registered management company under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2D Subch. I; or(3) is subject to the reporting obligations imposed by 15 U.S.C. § 78o-6 (relating to securities analysts and research reports) by reason of having filed a registration statement that has become effective under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2A (relating to securities and trust indentures)."Redemption terminal." The collective hardware, software, communications technology and other ancillary equipment used to facilitate the payment of cash or cash equivalent to a player as a result of playing a skill gaming terminal."Security." As defined in section 102 of the act of December 5, 1972 (P.L.1280, No.284), known as the Pennsylvania Securities Act of 1972."Skill gaming area." The area of an establishment licensee's premises where skill gaming terminals and redemption terminals are installed for operation and play."Skill Gaming Fund." The Skill Gaming Fund established in section 6102 (relating to taxes and assessments)."Skill gaming terminal." The following:20250SB0756PN0796 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A mechanical or electrical contrivance, terminal, machine or other device approved by the board that, upon insertion of cash or cash equivalent, is available to play or operate one or more games, the outcome of which game is determined predominantly by the skill of the player, rather than by chance, and offers the player the potential for a winning result with every play.(2) The term does not include a slot machine or hybrid slot machine operated at a licensed facility in accordance with Part II or a coin-operated amusement game.(3) The term does not include the lottery as defined under the State Lottery Law.(4) The term does not include a video gaming terminal operated at a truck stop establishment in accordance with Part III.(5) The term does not include a website, program, software or mobile device application that offers the player the ability to play a game that may award a winning player cash or cash equivalent."Slot machine." As defined in section 1103 (relating to definitions)."State Treasurer." The State Treasurer of the Commonwealth."Subsidiary." As defined in section 1103."Terminal operator." A person that owns, services or maintains skill gaming terminals for placement and operation on the premises of an establishment licensee in this Commonwealth pursuant to this part and the regulations promulgated under this part."Terminal operator license." A license issued by the board authorizing a terminal operator to place and operate skill 20250SB0756PN0796 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gaming terminals in an establishment licensee's premises pursuant to this part and the regulations promulgated under this part."Terminal operator licensee." A person that holds a terminal operator license issued by the board under this part."Terminal placement agreement." The formal written agreement or contract between an applicant for a terminal operator license or terminal operator licensee and an applicant for an establishment license or establishment licensee which specifies the terms and conditions regarding the conduct of skill gaming at the premises of an establishment licensee or an applicant for an establishment license.CHAPTER 53ADMINISTRATIONSec.5301. Powers of board.5302. Regulatory authority of board.5303. Temporary regulations.5304. Appeals.5305. Records and confidentiality of information.5306. Reporting.5307. (Reserved).5308. Authority of department.5309. Central control computer system.5310. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.§ 5301. Powers of board.(a) General powers.--(1) The board shall have general and sole regulatory authority over the conduct of skill gaming or related 20250SB0756PN0796 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 activities as described in this part. The board shall ensure the integrity of the acquisition and operation of skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment and shall have sole regulatory authority over every aspect of the conduct of skill gaming.(2) The board may employ individuals as necessary to carry out the requirements of this part who shall serve at the board's pleasure.(b) Specific powers.--The board shall have the power and duty:(1) To require background investigations from applicants and licensees under the jurisdiction of the board.(2) At its discretion, to issue, approve, renew, revoke, suspend, condition or deny issuance or renewal of licenses or other authorizations that may be required under this part.(3) At its discretion, to suspend, condition or deny issuance or renewal of a license under this part or other authorization or levy a fine or other sanction for a violation of this part.(4) To require prospective and licensed gaming employees to submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee. The Pennsylvania State Police or its authorized designee shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.(5) To require prospective and licensed gaming employees to submit photographs consistent with a statement of policy developed by the board.(6) To determine the suitability of a person who 20250SB0756PN0796 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 furnishes or seeks to furnish to a terminal operator licensee, either directly or indirectly, any goods, services or property related to the conduct of skill gaming.(7) To approve an application for or issue or renew a license under this part or other authorization that may be required by the board, if the board is satisfied the person has demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the person is of good character, honesty and integrity whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest or the effective regulation and control of skill gaming operations or create or enhance the danger of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of skill gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto.(8) To publish on the board's publicly accessible Internet website a complete list of persons or entities who applied for or held a terminal operator license, establishment license or manufacturer license at any time during the preceding calendar year and affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies thereof and the status of the application or license.(9) To prepare and, through the Governor, submit annually to the General Assembly an itemized budget consistent with Article VI of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, consisting of the amounts necessary to be appropriated by the General Assembly out of the accounts established under section 6104 (relating to regulatory assessments) required to meet the obligations under this part accruing during the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fiscal period beginning July 1 of the following year.(10) To collect and post information on the board's publicly accessible Internet website with sufficient detail to inform the public of persons with a controlling interest or ownership interest in an applicant for a license under this part or affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant for a license under this part. The posting shall include:(i) If the applicant is a publicly traded domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other legal entity, the names of persons with a controlling interest.(ii) If the applicant is a privately held domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other legal entity, the names of all persons with an ownership interest equal to or greater than 1%.(iii) The name of a person entitled to cast the vote of a person named under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(iv) The names of officers, directors and principals of the applicant for a license or licensee.(11) To determine, designate and classify employees of a licensee as key employees.(c) Nonlapse.--If appropriations for the administration of this part are not enacted by June 30 of any year, money appropriated for the administration of this part which is unexpended, uncommitted and unencumbered at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure by the board or other agency to which the money was appropriated until the enactment of an appropriation for the ensuing fiscal year.§ 5302. Regulatory authority of board.20250SB0756PN0796 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Powers and duties.--The board shall have the power and duty:(1) To deny, deny the renewal, revoke, condition or suspend a license or permit provided for in this part if the board finds in the board's sole discretion that an applicant, licensee or permittee under this part or its officers, employees or agents have furnished false or misleading information to the board or failed to comply with the provisions of this part or the rules and regulations of the board and that it would be in the public interest to deny, deny the renewal, revoke, condition or suspend the license or permit.(2) To restrict access to confidential information in the possession of the board that has been obtained under this part and ensure that the confidentiality of information is maintained and protected.(3) To prescribe and require periodic financial reporting and internal control requirements for terminal operator licensees.(4) To require that each terminal operator licensee provide to the board the terminal operator licensee's annual financial statements, with such additional detail as the board shall require, which shall be submitted not later than 180 days after the end of the licensee's fiscal year.(5) To prescribe the procedures to be followed by terminal operator licensees for a financial event that occurs in the operation and play of skill gaming terminals.(6) To require that each establishment licensee prohibits minors from operating or using skill gaming terminals or redemption terminals or entering a skill gaming 20250SB0756PN0796 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area.(7) To establish procedures for the inspection and certification of compliance of skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment prior to being placed into use on the premises of an establishment licensee by a terminal operator licensee.(8) To require that no skill gaming terminal may be set to pay out less than the theoretical payout percentage, which percentage shall be no less than 85%, as specifically approved by the board, with respect to any portion or phase of a game that the board determines in its sole discretion is predominantly based on chance. The board shall adopt regulations that define the theoretical payout percentage for any predominantly chance-based portion or phase of a game offered by a skill gaming terminal based on the total value of the jackpots expected to be paid by a play on a skill gaming terminal game divided by the total value of the skill gaming terminal's wagers expected to be made on that play or skill gaming terminal game during the same portion of the game cycle.(9) To require that every game offered by a skill gaming terminal offers the player the potential for a winning result with every play, and that the rules of play, including notification of the potential for a winning result with every play, are prominently displayed either on the skill gaming terminal face or screen.(10) To require that a terminal operator provide on behalf of an establishment license applicant, detailed site plans of proposed skill gaming area for review and approval by the board for the purpose of determining the adequacy of 20250SB0756PN0796 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the proposed security and surveillance measures as well as documentation of all costs expended or to be expended by the terminal operator at the premise of an establishment licensee to ensure compliance with section 5702(b)(5) (relating to skill gaming limitations). The applicant shall cooperate with the board in making changes to the plans suggested by the board and shall ensure that the plans as modified and approved are implemented. The board may adopt rules to establish reasonable placement requirements.(11) To create rules and promulgate regulations governing the advertisement of skill gaming terminals, provided that the board shall require all advertisements to display or reference the toll-free problem gambling telephone number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency under section 5310(b) (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(12) To enter into contracts with persons for the purposes of carrying out the powers and duties of the board under this part.(13) To adopt regulations governing the postemployment limitations and restrictions applicable to members and employees of the board subject to section 6302 (relating to additional board restrictions). In developing the regulations, the board may consult with the State Ethics Commission, governmental agencies and the disciplinary board of the Supreme Court regarding postemployment limitations and restrictions on members and employees of the board who are members of the Pennsylvania Bar.(14) To review and approve all cash and cash equivalent 20250SB0756PN0796 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 handling policies and procedures employed by terminal operator licensees.(15) To promulgate regulations governing the placement of automated teller machines within or adjacent to skill gaming areas.(16) To establish mandatory age-verification training and procedures for establishment licensees and their employees to ensure that minors do not utilize or access a skill gaming area, skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal.(17) To establish mandatory online problem gambling training to be completed by all employees of licensed entities under this part.(18) To determine in the board's sole discretion whether a game, portion of a game or software meets the definition of "skill gaming terminal" under section 5102 (relating to definitions).(19) To coordinate with the Bureau of Liquor Control Enforcement of the Pennsylvania State Police to establish a county quota for skill gaming establishment licenses for each county in this Commonwealth, which shall be calculated as the aggregate number of licenses issued by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board in the following license categories for each respective county as of the effective date, limited to those licenses that are in either active or safekeeping status:(i) Brewery.(ii) Brewery pub.(iii) Brewery storage.(iv) Hotel (liquor).20250SB0756PN0796 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Hotel (malt).(vi) Restaurant.(vii) Catering club (liquor).(viii) Club (liquor).(ix) Club (malt).(x) Distributor (malt).(xi) Importing distributor (malt).(xii) Eating place retail dispenser (malt).(20) To prohibit the transfer of any skill gaming establishment license to a location other than the location for which the license was issued.(21) To prohibit the issuance of any skill gaming establishment license that would result in the applicable county quota being exceeded.(22) To establish procedures for an establishment license that is revoked, suspended or surrendered, which shall provide for reissuance of the establishment license to an eligible establishment in the county where the license was originally issued.(23) To create rules and promulgate regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this part.(b) Applicable law.--Except as provided in section 5303 (relating to temporary regulations), regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.§ 5303. Temporary regulations.(a) Promulgation.--In order to facilitate the prompt 20250SB0756PN0796 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implementation of this part, regulations promulgated by the board shall be deemed temporary regulations which shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The board may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Publication.--The board shall transmit the temporary regulations promulgated under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Expiration.--Except for temporary regulations related to security and surveillance and standards for terminal placement agreements, the authority provided to the board to adopt temporary regulations in subsection (a) shall expire two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. Regulations adopted after that date shall be promulgated as provided by law.§ 5304. Appeals.An applicant, licensee or permittee may appeal a final order, determination or decision of the board involving the approval, issuance, denial, revocation, nonrenewal, suspension or conditioning, including any disciplinary actions, of a license, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permit or authorization under this part in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).§ 5305. Records and confidentiality of information.(a) Records.--The board shall maintain files and records deemed necessary for the administration and enforcement of this part.(b) Confidentiality of information.--(1) The following information submitted by an applicant, licensee or permittee under Chapter 55 (relating to application and licensure) or obtained by the board or the bureau as part of a background or other investigation from any source shall be confidential and withheld from public disclosure:(i) Information relating to character, honesty and integrity, including family, habits, reputation, history of criminal activity, business activities, financial affairs and business, professional and personal associations submitted to or otherwise obtained by the board or the bureau.(ii) Nonpublic personal information, including home addresses, telephone numbers and other personal contact information, Social Security numbers, educational records, memberships, medical records, tax returns and declarations, actual or proposed compensation, financial account records, creditworthiness or financial condition relating to an applicant, licensee or permittee or the immediate family thereof.(iii) Information relating to proprietary 20250SB0756PN0796 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information, trade secrets, patents or exclusive licenses, architectural and engineering plans and information relating to competitive marketing materials and strategies, including customer-identifying information or customer prospects for services subject to competition.(iv) Security information, including risk prevention plans, detection and countermeasures, emergency management plans, security and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols and theft and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures.(v) Information with respect to which there is a reasonable possibility that public release or inspection of the information would constitute an unwarranted invasion into personal privacy of an individual as determined by the board.(vi) Records of an applicant, licensee or permittee not required to be filed with the securities and exchange commission by issuers that either have securities registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78l (relating to registration requirements for securities) or are required to file reports under 15 U.S.C. § 78o (relating to registration and regulation of brokers and dealers).(vii) Records considered nonpublic matters or information by the Securities and Exchange Commission as provided by 17 CFR 200.80 (relating to Securities and Exchange Commission records and information).(viii) Financial information provided to the board by an applicant, licensee or permittee.(2) No claim of confidentiality may be made regarding 20250SB0756PN0796 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal history record information that is available to the public under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b) (relating to general regulations).(3) Except as provided in paragraph (1), no claim of confidentiality may be made regarding a record in possession of the board that is otherwise publicly available from the board under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(4) Except as provided in section 5904(h) (relating to investigations and enforcement), the information made confidential under this section shall be withheld from public disclosure in whole or in part, except that confidential information shall be released upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction or, with the approval of the attorney general, to a duly authorized law enforcement agency or shall be released to the public, in whole or in part, to the extent that the release is requested by an applicant, licensee or permittee and does not otherwise contain confidential information about another person.(5) The board may seek a voluntary waiver of confidentiality from an applicant, licensee or permittee but may not require an applicant, licensee or permittee to waive the confidentiality provided under this subsection as a condition for the approval of an application, renewal of a license or other action of the board.(6) (i) No current or former member and no current or former employee, agent or independent contractor of the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or other Executive Branch office who has obtained confidential information in the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performance of duties under this part shall intentionally disclose the information to a person, knowing that the information being disclosed is confidential under this subsection, unless the person is authorized by law to receive the information.(ii) A violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(iii) In addition to any penalty under subparagraph (ii), an employee, agent or independent contractor who violates this subsection shall be administratively disciplined by discharge, suspension, termination of contract or other formal disciplinary action as appropriate. If a current member violates this paragraph, the other members shall refer the matter to the current member's appointing authority.(c) Notice.--Notice of the contents of information, except to a duly authorized law enforcement agency pursuant to this section, shall be given to an applicant or licensee in a manner prescribed by the regulations adopted by the board.(d) Information held by other agencies.--Files, records, reports and other information in the possession of the department pertaining to an applicant, licensee or permittee shall be made available to the board as may be necessary to the effective administration of this part.§ 5306. Reporting.(a) Report by board.--Beginning October 1, 2027, and every year thereafter, the annual report submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by the board under section 1211 (relating to reports of board) shall include information on the conduct of skill gaming for the previous calendar year:20250SB0756PN0796 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Total gross skill gaming terminal revenue.(2) Total number of terminal operator licensees, manufacturer licensees and establishment licensees.(3) All taxes, fees, fines and other revenue collected and, where appropriate, revenue disbursed. The department shall collaborate with the board to carry out the requirements of this paragraph.(4) Other information related to the conduct of skill gaming that the board deems appropriate.(b) Participation.--The board may require licensees to provide information to the board to assist in the preparation of the report under subsection (a).§ 5307. (Reserved).§ 5308. Authority of department.(a) Duties.--The department shall administer and collect taxes imposed under this part and interest imposed under section 806 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, and promulgate and enforce regulations to carry out its prescribed duties in accordance with this part, including the collection of taxes, penalties and interest imposed by this part.(b) Application of regulations.--The department may prescribe the extent, if any, to which any regulations shall be applied without retroactive effect. The department shall prescribe the forms and the system of accounting and recordkeeping to be employed and through its representative shall at all times have power of access to and examination and audit of any equipment and records relating to all aspects of the operation of skill gaming terminals and redemption terminals under this part.20250SB0756PN0796 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Procedure.--For purposes of implementing this part, the department may promulgate regulations in the same manner in which the board is authorized as provided in section 5303 (relating to temporary regulations).(d) Additional penalty.--A person who fails to timely remit to the department or the State Treasurer amounts required under this part shall be liable, in addition to liability imposed elsewhere in this part, to a penalty of 5% per month up to a maximum of 25% of the amounts ultimately found to be due, to be recovered by the department.(e) Liens and suits for taxes.--The provisions of this part shall be subject to the provisions of sections 242 and 243 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.§ 5309. Central control computer system.(a) Terminal requirements.--To facilitate the auditing and security programs critical to the integrity of skill gaming terminals in this Commonwealth, the department shall require that skill gaming terminals and redemption terminals meet the following:(1) Terminals shall be linked, at an appropriate time to be determined by the department, to a central control computer under the control of the department and accessible by the board to provide auditing program capacity and individual terminal information as approved by the department.(2) Terminals shall include real-time information retrieval and terminal activation and disabling programs.(b) System requirements.--The central control computer employed by the department shall provide:20250SB0756PN0796 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A fully operational Statewide skill gaming terminal control system that has the capability of supporting up to the maximum number of skill gaming terminals authorized under this part.(2) The employment of a widely accepted gaming industry protocol to facilitate a skill gaming terminal's ability to communicate with the Statewide system.(3) The delivery of a system that has the ability to verify software, detect alterations in payout and detect other methods of fraud in all aspects of the operation of skill gaming terminals.(4) The delivery of a system that does not alter the statistical awards of skill gaming terminal games as designed by the manufacturer licensee and approved by the board.(5) The delivery of a system that provides redundancy so that each component of the network is capable of operating independently if any component of the network, including the central control computer, fails or cannot be operated for any reason as determined by the department, and to assure that all transactional data is captured and secured. Costs associated with a computer system required by the department to operate within a skill gaming area, whether independent or as part of the central control computer, shall be paid by the terminal operator licensee. The computer system shall be controlled by the department and accessible to the board.(6) The ability to meet all reporting and control requirements as prescribed by the board and department.(7) The delivery of a system that provides centralized issuance of cash redemption tickets and facilitates the acceptance of the tickets by skill gaming terminals and 20250SB0756PN0796 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 redemption terminals.(8) Other capabilities as determined by the department in consultation with the board.(c) Personal information.--The central control computer may not provide for the monitoring or reading of personal or financial information concerning a player of a terminal operator licensee.(d) Initial acquisition of central control computer.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this part, initial contracts entered into by the department for a central control computer, including necessary computer hardware, software, licenses or related services, shall not be subject to the provisions of 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement).(2) Contracts made pursuant to the provisions of this section may not exceed five years.(e) Resolution of contract disputes.--The process specified in 62 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 Subch. B (relating to prelitigation resolution of controversies) shall be the sole means of resolution for controversies arising with respect to contracts executed under this section.(f) Existing central control computer system.--The department, in its discretion, may alter or utilize the central control computer system controlled by the department under section 1323 (relating to central control computer system) to fulfill the requirements of this section.§ 5310. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.(a) Program update.--(1) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a 20250SB0756PN0796 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 successor agency shall update the compulsive and problem gambling program established in section 1509 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program) to address public education, awareness and training regarding compulsive and problem gambling and the treatment and prevention of compulsive and problem gambling related to skill gaming terminals.(2) The updated guidelines shall include strategies for the prevention of compulsive and problem gambling related to skill gaming terminals.(3) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a successor agency may consult with the board and terminal operator licensees to develop the strategies.(b) Duties of Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.--From money available in the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a successor agency shall with respect to skill gaming terminals:(1) Maintain one compulsive gambler's assistance organization's toll-free problem gambling telephone number, which number shall be 1-800-GAMBLER, to provide crisis counseling and referral services to individuals and families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem or compulsive gambling.(2) Maintain one compulsive gambler's assistance organization's telephone number, which shall be accessible via a free text message service, to provide crisis counseling and referral services to individuals and families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem or compulsive gambling.20250SB0756PN0796 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Facilitate, through in-service training and other means, the availability of effective assistance programs for problem and compulsive gamblers and family members affected by problem and compulsive gambling.(4) At its discretion, conduct studies to identify individuals in this Commonwealth who are or are at risk of becoming problem or compulsive gamblers.(5) Provide grants to and contract with single county authorities and other organizations that provide services specified in this section.(6) Reimburse organizations for reasonable expenses incurred assisting the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency with implementing this section.(7) Maintain a comprehensive list of all self-excluded individuals under section 1516 (relating to list of persons self excluded from gaming activities), 3903 (relating to self-exclusion) or 5903 (relating to self-exclusion).(c) Additional duties.--Within 60 days following the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a successor agency and the board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling shall jointly collaborate with other appropriate offices and agencies of State or local government, including single county authorities and providers and other persons, public or private, with expertise in compulsive and problem gambling treatment with respect to skill gaming terminals to:(1) Implement a strategic plan for the prevention and treatment of compulsive and problem gambling.(2) Adopt compulsive and problem gambling treatment standards to be integrated with the Department of Drug and 20250SB0756PN0796 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Alcohol Programs' or a successor agency's uniform Statewide guidelines that govern the provision of addiction treatment services.(3) Develop a method to coordinate compulsive and problem gambling data collection and referral information to crisis response hotlines, child welfare and domestic violence programs and providers and other appropriate programs and providers.(4) Develop and disseminate educational materials to provide public awareness related to the prevention, recognition and treatment of compulsive and problem gambling.(5) Develop demographic-specific compulsive and problem gambling prevention, intervention and treatment programs.(6) Prepare an itemized budget outlining how money will be allocated to fulfill the responsibilities under this section.(d) Report.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a successor agency shall include in the report required under section 1509 information involving skill gaming terminals.CHAPTER 55APPLICATION AND LICENSURESec.5501. General prohibition.5502. Terminal operator licenses.5503. (Reserved).5504. Principal licenses.5505. Key employee licenses.5506. Divestiture of disqualifying applicant.5507. (Reserved).5508. Manufacturer licenses.20250SB0756PN0796 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5509. Gaming service provider.5510. Occupation permit.5511. Alternative terminal operator licensing standards.5512. Alternative manufacturer licensing standards.5513. (Reserved).5514. Establishment licenses.5515. License or permit prohibition.5516. Issuance and renewal.5517. Change in ownership or control of terminal operator licensee.5518. Skill gaming accounting controls and audits.5519. Multiple licenses prohibited.§ 5501. General prohibition.Within 10 months after the effective date of this section, a person who offers or otherwise makes available for play in this Commonwealth any game that involves any element of chance, regardless of the extent to which the outcome of play is determined by elements of chance or by the skill of the player, and such game is not licensed and regulated by the board or expressly authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth, such person commits a crime in violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.) and is subject to the penalties therein, as well as the penalties specified in section 5905 (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).§ 5502. Terminal operator licenses.(a) General requirements.--An application for a terminal operator license shall be on the form developed and required by the board and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The name, address and photograph of the applicant and of all directors and owners and key employees and their 20250SB0756PN0796 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 positions within the corporation or organization, as well as additional financial information required by the board.(2) A current tax lien certificate issued by the department.(3) The details of any gaming license applied for, granted to or denied to the applicant by another jurisdiction where the form of gaming is legal and the consent for the board to acquire copies of the application submitted or license issued in connection with the application.(4) The details of any loan obtained from a financial institution or not obtained from a financial institution.(5) The consent to conduct a background investigation by the board, the scope of which investigation shall be determined by the bureau in its discretion consistent with this part and a release signed by all persons subject to the investigation of all information required to complete the investigation.(6) The details of the applicant's diversity plan to ensure that all persons are accorded equality of opportunity in employment and contracting by the applicant, its contractors, subcontractors, assignees, lessees, agents, vendors and suppliers.(7) Any information concerning maintenance and operation of skill gaming terminals in any other jurisdiction.(8) Proof that the applicant has or will establish a place of business in this Commonwealth. A terminal operator licensee shall maintain its place of business in this Commonwealth to remain eligible for licensure.(9) Any other information determined to be appropriate by the board.20250SB0756PN0796 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Character requirements.--An application for a terminal operator license shall include such information, documentation and assurances as may be required to establish by clear and convincing evidence of the applicant's suitability, including good character, honesty and integrity. The application shall include, without limitation, information pertaining to family, habits, character, reputation, criminal history background, business activities, financial affairs and business, professional and personal associates, covering at least the 10-year period immediately preceding the filing date of the application.(c) Civil judgments.--An applicant shall notify the board of any civil judgment obtained against the applicant pertaining to laws of the Federal Government, this Commonwealth or another state, jurisdiction, province or country.(d) (Reserved).(e) (Reserved).(f) Additional eligibility requirements.--In order to be eligible for a terminal operator license under this part, the principals and key employees of the applicant must obtain a license to meet the character requirements of this section or other eligibility requirements established by the board.(g) Classification system.--The board shall develop a classification system for other agents, employees or persons who directly or indirectly hold or are deemed to be holding debt or equity securities or other financial interest in the applicant and for other persons that the board considers appropriate for review under this section.(h) Related entities.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person may 20250SB0756PN0796 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be eligible to receive a terminal operator license unless the principals and key employees of each intermediary or holding company of the person meet the requirements of subsection (f).(2) The board may require that lenders and underwriters of intermediaries, subsidiaries or holding companies of a terminal operator license applicant meet the requirements of subsection (f) if the board determines that the suitability of a lender or underwriter is at issue and necessary to consider a pending application for a terminal operator license.(i) Revocable privilege.--The issuance or renewal of a license or other authorization by the board under this section shall be a revocable privilege.(j) Waiver for publicly traded corporations.--The board may waive the requirements of subsection (f) for a person directly or indirectly holding ownership of securities in a publicly traded corporation if the board determines that the holder of the securities does not have the ability to control the corporation or elect one or more directors thereof.(k) (Reserved).(l) Ongoing duty.--A person applying for a license or other authorization under this part shall continue to provide information required by the board or the bureau and cooperate in any inquiry or investigation.(m) Criminal history record check.--The board may conduct a criminal history record check on a person for whom a waiver is granted under this section.(n) Applicant financial information.--(1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal 20250SB0756PN0796 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances concerning financial background and resources as the board deems necessary to establish by clear and convincing evidence the financial stability, integrity and responsibility of the applicant, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, including bank references, business and personal income and disbursement schedules, tax returns and other reports filed with governmental agencies and business and personal accounting and check records and ledgers.(2) An applicant shall in writing authorize the examination of all bank accounts and records as may be deemed necessary by the board.(o) Financial backer information.--(1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances as may be necessary to establish by clear and convincing evidence the integrity of all financial backers, institutional investors, investors, mortgagees, bondholders and holders of indentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, either in effect or proposed.(2) The board may waive the qualification requirements for banking or lending institutions and institutional investors.(3) A banking or lending institution or institutional investor shall produce for the board upon request any document or information that bears relation to the proposal submitted by the applicant or applicants.(4) The integrity of the financial sources shall be judged upon the same standards as the applicant. Any such 20250SB0756PN0796 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person or entity shall produce for the board upon request any document or information which bears any relation to the application.(5) The applicant shall produce whatever information, documentation or assurances the board requires to establish by clear and convincing evidence the adequacy of financial resources.(p) Applicant's business experience.--(1) The board shall require an applicant for a terminal operator license to produce the information, documentation and assurances as the board may require to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant has sufficient business ability and experience to create and maintain a successful, efficient operation.(2) An applicant shall produce the names of all proposed key employees and a description of the proposed key employees' respective or proposed responsibilities as they become known.(q) Additional information.--In addition to other information required by this part, a person applying for a terminal operator license shall provide the following information:(1) The organization, financial structure and nature of all businesses operated by the person, including any affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding companies, the names and personal employment and criminal histories of all officers, directors and key employees of the corporation; the names of all holding, intermediary, affiliate and subsidiary companies of the corporation; and the organization, financial structure and nature of all businesses operated by such 20250SB0756PN0796 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holding, intermediary and subsidiary companies as the board may require, including names and personal employment and criminal histories of such officers, directors and principal employees of such corporations and companies as the board may require.(2) The extent of securities held in the corporation by all officers, directors and underwriters and their remuneration in the form of salary, wages, fees or otherwise.(3) Copies of all management and service contracts.(r) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p) and (q) have been met, the board may approve the application and issue the applicant a terminal operator license consistent with all of the following:(1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of any changes relating to the status of its license or to any information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Any other condition established by the board.(s) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of a terminal operator license, the terminal operator licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), (f), (g), (h), 20250SB0756PN0796 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i), (j), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p) and (q), the board may renew the licensee's terminal operator license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the terminal operator license, the terminal operator license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.§ 5503. (Reserved).§ 5504. Principal licenses.(a) License required.--All principals shall obtain a principal license from the board.(b) Application.--A principal license application shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:(1) Verification of status as a principal from a terminal operator licensee or manufacturer licensee.(2) A description of responsibilities as a principal.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, employers and other organizations.(4) Details relating to a similar license, permit or other authorization obtained in another jurisdiction.(5) Additional information required by the board.(c) Issuance.--Following review of the application and the background investigation, the board may issue a principal license if the applicant has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is a person of good character, honesty and integrity and is eligible and suitable to be licensed as a principal.(d) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall be nontransferable.20250SB0756PN0796 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Principals.--An individual who receives a principal license need not obtain a key employee license.§ 5505. Key employee licenses.(a) License required.--A key employee, including a gaming manager and a procurement agent, shall obtain a key employee license from the board, regardless of whether employed by a licensee or serving as an independent contractor to the licensee.(b) Application.--A key employee license application shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:(1) Verification of status as a key employee from a terminal operator licensee, establishment licensee or manufacturer licensee.(2) A description of employment responsibilities.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, employers and other organizations.(4) Details relating to a similar license or other authorization obtained in another jurisdiction.(5) Additional information required by the board.(c) Issuance.--Following review of the application and the background investigation, the board may issue a key employee license if the applicant has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is a person of good character, honesty and integrity and is eligible and suitable to be licensed as a key employee.(d) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall be nontransferable.§ 5506. Divestiture of disqualifying applicant.(a) Board power to require.--20250SB0756PN0796 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) In the event that an establishment license application, terminal operator license application or manufacturer license application is not approved by the board based on a finding that an individual who is a principal or has an interest in the person applying for the license does not meet the character requirements of this part or any of the eligibility requirements under this part or a person who purchases a controlling interest in the applicant in violation of section 5517 (relating to change in ownership or control of terminal operator licensee), the board may afford the individual the opportunity to completely divest the individual's interest in the person, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company seeking the license and, after divestiture, reconsider the person's or applicant's suitability for licensure in an expedited proceeding and may, after the proceeding, issue the person or applicant a terminal operator license.(2) The board shall approve the terms and conditions of any divestiture under this section.(b) Limitation.--Under no circumstances shall any divestiture be approved by the board if the compensation for the divested interest exceeds the cost of the interest.§ 5507. (Reserved).§ 5508. Manufacturer licenses.(a) Application.--A person seeking to manufacture skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment for use in this Commonwealth must apply to the board for a manufacturer license.(b) Requirements.--An application for a manufacturer license shall be on a form required by the board and shall include all 20250SB0756PN0796 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the following:(1) The name and business address of the applicant and the applicant's affiliates, intermediaries, subsidiaries and holding companies; the principals and key employees of each business; and a list of employees and their positions within each business, as well as financial information required by the board.(2) A statement that the applicant and each affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of the applicant are not terminal operator licensees.(3) The consent to a background investigation by the bureau of the applicant, its principals, its key employees, its intermediaries, its subsidiaries or other persons required by the board and a release to obtain the information necessary for the completion of the background investigation.(4) The details of any equivalent license granted or denied by other jurisdictions where gaming activities as authorized by this part are permitted.(5) The details of any manufacturer license issued by the board to the applicant under section 1317.1 (relating to manufacturer licenses) or 3508 (relating to manufacturer licenses), if applicable.(6) The type of skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment to be manufactured or repaired.(7) Other information determined by the board to be appropriate.(c) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsection (b) have been met, the board may approve the application and grant the applicant a manufacturer 20250SB0756PN0796 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license consistent with all of the following:(1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve the licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or to other information contained in application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Other conditions established by the board.(d) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of a manufacturer license, the manufacturer licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsection (b), the board may renew the licensee's manufacturer license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the manufacturer license, the manufacturer license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.(e) Authority.--A manufacturer licensee or its designee, as licensed by the board under this part, may supply or repair a skill gaming terminal, redemption terminal or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer licensee.(f) Prohibitions.--(1) No person may manufacture skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment for sale, lease 20250SB0756PN0796 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or use within this Commonwealth unless the person has been issued a manufacturer license under this part.(2) No person issued a manufacturer license under this section may apply for or be issued a terminal operator license under section 5502 (relating to terminal operator licenses) or establishment license under section 5514 (relating to establishment licenses).§ 5509. Gaming service provider.(a) Development of classification system.--The board shall develop a classification system governing the certification, registration and regulation of gaming service providers and individuals and entities associated with them. The classification system shall be based upon the following:(1) Whether the employees of the gaming service provider will have access to the skill gaming area or skill gaming terminals or redemption terminals prior to or after installation.(2) Whether the goods or services provided or to be provided by the gaming service provider would impact the integrity of the conduct of skill gaming.(b) Authority to exempt.--The board may exempt a person or type of business from the requirements of this section if the board determines:(1) the person or type of business is regulated by an agency of the Federal Government, an agency of the Commonwealth or the Pennsylvania Supreme Court; or(2) the regulation of the person or type of business is determined not to be necessary in order to protect the public interest or the integrity of gaming.(c) Duties of gaming service providers.--A gaming service 20250SB0756PN0796 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provider shall have a continuing duty to:(1) Provide all information, documentation and assurances as the board may require.(2) Cooperate with the board in investigations, hearings and enforcement and disciplinary actions.(3) Comply with all conditions, restrictions, requirements, orders and rulings of the board in accordance with this part.(4) Report a change in circumstances that may render the gaming service provider ineligible, unqualified or unsuitable for continued registration or certification.(d) Requirement for permit.--The board may require employees of a gaming service provider to obtain a permit or other authorization if, after an analysis of duties, responsibilities and functions, the board determines that a permit or other authorization is necessary to protect the integrity of gaming.(e) Interim authorization.--The board or a designated employee of the board may permit a gaming service provider applicant to engage in business with an applicant for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee prior to approval of the gaming service provider application if the following criteria have been satisfied:(1) A completed application has been filed with the board by the gaming service provider.(2) The terminal operator license applicant or terminal operator licensee contracting or doing business with the gaming service provider certifies that it has performed due diligence on the gaming service provider and believes that the applicant meets the qualification to be a gaming service provider under this section.20250SB0756PN0796 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The gaming service provider applicant agrees in writing that the grant of interim authorization to conduct business prior to board approval of the application does not create a right to continue to engage in business if the board determines that the applicant is not suitable or continued authorization is not in the public interest.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the board from rescinding a grant of interim authorization if, at any time, the suitability of the person subject to interim authorization is at issue or if the person fails to cooperate with the board or the bureau or an agent of the board or bureau.(g) Gaming service provider lists.--(1) The board shall:(i) Develop and maintain a list of approved gaming service providers who are authorized to provide goods or services whether under a grant of interim or continued authorization.(ii) Develop and maintain a list of prohibited gaming service providers.(2) An applicant for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee may not enter into an agreement or engage in business with a gaming service provider listed on the prohibited gaming service provider list.(h) Emergency authorization.--(1) A terminal operator licensee may utilize a gaming service provider that has not been approved by the board when a threat to public health, welfare or safety exists or circumstances outside the control of the terminal operator licensee require immediate action to mitigate damage or loss 20250SB0756PN0796 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the licensee's skill gaming terminals.(2) The board shall promulgate regulations to govern the use of gaming service providers under emergency circumstances. The regulations shall include a requirement that the terminal operator licensee contact the board immediately upon utilizing a gaming service provider that has not been approved by the board.(i) Criminal history record information.--If the classification system developed by the board in accordance with subsection (a) requires a gaming service provider or an individual or entity associated with the gaming service provider to submit to or provide the bureau with criminal history record information under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), the bureau shall notify a terminal operator licensee that submitted a certification under subsection (e)(2) whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor gambling offense.§ 5510. Occupation permit.(a) Application.--(1) An individual who desires to be a gaming employee and has a bona fide offer of employment from a terminal operator licensee or establishment licensee shall apply to the board for an occupation permit.(2) An individual may not be employed as a gaming employee unless and until that individual holds an appropriate occupation permit issued under this section.(3) The board may promulgate regulations to reclassify a category of nongaming employees or gaming employees upon a finding that the reclassification is in the public interest and consistent with the objectives of this part.20250SB0756PN0796 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Requirements.--The application for an occupation permit shall include, at a minimum:(1) The name and home address of the individual.(2) The previous employment history of the individual.(3) The criminal history record of the individual, as well as the individual's consent for the bureau to conduct a background investigation.(4) A photograph of the individual.(5) Evidence of the offer of employment and the nature and scope of the proposed duties of the individual, if known.(6) The details of an occupation permit or similar license granted or denied to the individual in other jurisdictions.(7) Other information determined by the board to be appropriate.(c) Prohibition.--A terminal operator licensee may not employ or permit an individual under 18 years of age to render service in a skill gaming area.§ 5511. Alternative terminal operator licensing standards.(a) Determination.--(1) The board may determine whether the licensing standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which an applicant, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company for a terminal operator license is similarly licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.(2) If the board makes that determination, the board may issue a terminal operator license to an applicant who holds a terminal operator license in the other jurisdiction after conducting an evaluation of the information relating to the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant from the other jurisdictions, as updated by the board, and evaluating other information related to the applicant received from that jurisdiction and other jurisdictions where the applicant may be licensed, the board may incorporate such information in whole or in part into the board's evaluation of the applicant.(b) Abbreviated process.--(1) In the event an applicant for a terminal operator license is licensed in another jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an alternate process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the licensee, to such an applicant.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive fees associated with obtaining a license through the normal application process.(c) Current license holders.--In the event an applicant for a terminal operator license under this part holds a slot machine license under Part II (relating to gaming) or a terminal operator license under Part III (relating to video gaming), the board shall use an abbreviated process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as an authorization for a terminal operator, manufacturer licensee or applicant to solicit or execute a terminal placement agreement prior to or after the effective date of this section.§ 5512. Alternative manufacturer licensing standards.20250SB0756PN0796 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Determination.--(1) The board may determine whether the licensing standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which an applicant for a manufacturer license is similarly licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.(2) If the board makes that determination, the board may issue a manufacturer license to an applicant who holds a similar manufacturer license in the other jurisdiction after conducting an evaluation of the information relating to the applicant from the other jurisdictions, as updated by the board, and evaluating other information related to the applicant received from that jurisdiction and other jurisdictions where the applicant may be licensed, the board may incorporate such information in whole or in part into the board's evaluation of the applicant.(b) Abbreviated process.--(1) In the event an applicant for a manufacturer license is licensed in another jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive fees associated with obtaining a license through the normal application process.(c) Current license holders.--In the event an applicant for a manufacturer license under this part holds a manufacturer license under section 1317.1 (relating to manufacturer licenses) or 3508 (relating to manufacturer licenses), the board may 20250SB0756PN0796 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a license, including financial viability of the applicant.§ 5513. (Reserved).§ 5514. Establishment licenses.(a) General requirements.--An eligible skill gaming establishment that submits an application for an establishment license under this part shall include at a minimum:(1) The name, address and photograph of the applicant and additional financial information required by the board.(2) A description of the proposed surveillance and security measures to ensure the security of the proposed skill gaming area.(3) A current tax lien certificate issued by the department.(4) The criminal history record of the applicant.(5) Verification that the applicant meets the definition of an eligible establishment under section 5102 (relating to definitions).(b) Nontransferability.--A license issued under this section shall not be transferable.(c) Ongoing duty.--An eligible skill gaming establishment applying for a license under this section shall continue to provide information required by the board or the bureau and cooperate in any inquiry or investigation.(d) Review and approval.--Upon being satisfied that the requirements of subsection (a) have been met, the board may approve the application and issue the applicant an establishment license consistent with all of the following:20250SB0756PN0796 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) (i) The license shall be valid for a period of five years.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or to information contained in application materials on file with the board.(2) The license shall be nontransferable.(3) Other conditions established by the board.(e) Renewal.--(1) At least six months prior to expiration of an establishment license, the establishment licensee seeking renewal of its license shall submit a renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee to the board.(2) If the renewal application satisfies the requirements of subsection (d), the board may renew the establishment license.(3) If the board receives a complete renewal application but fails to act upon the renewal application prior to the expiration of the establishment license, the establishment license shall continue in effect until acted upon by the board.(f) Eligibility requirements.--(1) Beginning 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph, an applicant shall have a 120-day period to apply for a skill gaming establishment license. An applicant must hold one of the following categories of license issued by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board, which license shall be either active or in safekeeping status:(i) Brewery.20250SB0756PN0796 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Brewery pub.(iii) Brewery storage.(iv) Hotel (liquor).(v) Hotel (malt).(vi) Restaurant.(vii) Catering club (liquor).(viii) Club (liquor).(ix) Club (malt).(x) Distributor (malt).(xi) Importing distributor (malt).(xii) Eating place retail dispenser (malt).(2) Beginning one year after the effective date of this paragraph, any establishment that is a lottery sales agent under section 305 of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, may apply to the board for any remaining establishment licenses, up to the county quota.(3) The board shall accept applications from lottery sales agents for a period of 60 days.(4) If the number of applications received by the board from lottery agents in a given county during the 90-day period under paragraph (3) exceeds the number of licenses available for that county, then the board shall randomly select from the pool of valid applications received and approve the applications of the randomly selected applicants, up to the county quota.§ 5515. License or permit prohibition.The following apply:(1) The board shall be prohibited from granting a license under this part to any applicant who has been 20250SB0756PN0796 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 convicted of a gambling-related felony offense in any jurisdiction. The board shall determine, in the board's sole discretion, whether a felony offense is gambling-related.(2) For purposes of this section, a felony offense is any of the following:(i) An offense classified as a felony or punishable under the laws of this Commonwealth by imprisonment for more than five years.(ii) An offense which, under the laws of another jurisdiction, is punishable by imprisonment for more than five years.(iii) An offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be subject to imprisonment for more than five years.(3) The board shall be prohibited from issuing a skill gaming establishment license if issuing such license would result in a county quota being exceeded.§ 5516. Issuance and renewal.(a) Issuance.--(1) In addition to any other criteria provided under this part, any terminal operator licensee, skill gaming establishment, manufacturer licensee, gaming employee, gaming manager, key employee, principal or other person that the board approves as qualified to receive a license, permit or other authorization under this part shall be issued a license upon the payment of a fee required in section 6101 (relating to fees) and upon the fulfillment of conditions required by the board or provided for in this part.(2) Nothing contained in this part is intended or shall 20250SB0756PN0796 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be construed to create an entitlement to a license or other authorization by a person.(b) Renewal.--(1) A license issued under this part unless otherwise provided shall be subject to renewal every five years.(2) The application for renewal of a license or permit, unless otherwise provided, shall be submitted at least 180 days prior to the expiration of the permit or license and shall include an update of the information contained in the initial application and any prior renewal applications and the payment of any renewal fee required by section 6101.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve a licensee of the affirmative duty to notify the board of a change relating to the status of its license or permit or to other information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(c) Revocation or failure to renew.--(1) In addition to other sanctions the board may impose under this part, the board may at its discretion suspend, revoke or deny renewal of a license issued under this part if the board receives information from any source that the applicant or any of its officers, directors, owners or key employees is in violation of any provision of this part, that the applicant has furnished the board with false or misleading information or that the information contained in the applicant's initial application or renewal application is no longer true and correct such that the applicant is no longer eligible.(2) In the event of a revocation or failure to renew, the licensee's authorization to conduct the previously 20250SB0756PN0796 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved activity shall immediately cease the activity and all fees paid in connection with the license shall be forfeited.(3) In the event of a suspension, the applicant's authorization to conduct the previously approved activity shall immediately cease until the board has notified the applicant that the suspension is no longer in effect.(d) Nontransferability of licenses.--(1) A license issued by the board is a grant of the privilege to conduct a business in this Commonwealth.(2) Except as permitted by section 5517 (relating to change in ownership or control of terminal operator licensee), a license granted or renewed under this part may not be sold, transferred or assigned to another person or location.(3) A licensee may not pledge or otherwise grant a security interest in or lien on the license.(4) The board has the sole discretion to issue, renew, condition or deny the issuance of a license based upon the requirements of this part.(5) Nothing contained in this part is intended or shall be construed to create in any person an entitlement to a license.§ 5517. Change in ownership or control of terminal operator licensee.(a) Notification and approval.--(1) A terminal operator licensee shall promptly notify the board of a proposed or contemplated change of ownership of the terminal operator licensee by a person or group of persons acting in concert which involves any of the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following:(i) More than 5% of a terminal operator licensee's securities or other ownership interests.(ii) More than 5% of the securities or other ownership interests of a corporation or other form of business entity that owns directly or indirectly at least 20% of the voting or other securities or other ownership interests of the terminal operator licensee.(iii) The sale of all or substantially all of a terminal operator licensee's assets.(iv) Any other transaction or occurrence deemed by the board to be relevant to license qualifications.(2) (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), a terminal operator licensee shall not be required to notify the board of an acquisition by an institutional investor under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) if the institutional investor holds less than 10% of the securities or other ownership interests referred to in paragraph (1)(i) or (ii), the securities or interests are publicly traded securities and its holdings of the securities were purchased for investment purposes only and the institutional investor files with the board a certified statement to the effect that it has no intention of influencing or affecting, directly or indirectly, the affairs of the licensee, provided, however, that it shall be permitted to vote on matters put to the vote of the outstanding security holders.(ii) Notice to the board and board approval shall be required prior to completion of any proposed or contemplated change of ownership of a terminal operator 20250SB0756PN0796 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee that meets the criteria of this section.(b) Qualification of purchaser of terminal operator licensee and change of control.--(1) The purchaser of all or substantially all of the assets of a terminal operator licensee shall, if not already a terminal operator licensee, independently qualify for a license in accordance with this part and shall pay the license fee as required by section 6101 (relating to fees).(2) A change in control of a terminal operator licensee shall require that the transferee must independently qualify for a license in accordance with this part, and the transferee shall pay a new license fee as required by section 6101, except as otherwise required by the board under this section.(3) The new license fee shall be paid upon the assignment and actual change of control or ownership of the terminal operator license.(c) Change in control defined.--For purposes of this section, a change in control of a terminal operator licensee shall mean the acquisition by a person or group of persons acting in concert of more than 20% of a terminal operator licensee's securities or other ownership interests, with the exception of any ownership interest of the person that existed at the time of initial licensing and payment of the initial license fee, or more than 20% of the securities or other ownership interests of a corporation or other form of business entity that owns directly or indirectly at least 20% of the voting or other securities or other ownership interests of the terminal operator licensee.(d) Fee reduction.--The board may in its discretion 20250SB0756PN0796 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eliminate the need for qualification or proportionately reduce, but not eliminate, the new license fee otherwise required under this section in connection with a change of control of a terminal operator licensee, depending upon the type of transaction, the relevant ownership interests and changes to the interests resulting from the transaction and other considerations deemed relevant by the board.(e) License revocation.--Failure to comply with this section may cause the license issued under this part to be revoked or suspended by the board unless the purchase of the assets or the change in control that meets the criteria of this section has been independently qualified in advance by the board and any required license fee has been paid.§ 5518. Skill gaming accounting controls and audits.(a) Approval.--Except as otherwise provided by this part, a terminal operator license applicant shall, in addition to obtaining a terminal operator license, obtain approval from the board in consultation with the department of its internal control systems and audit protocols prior to the installation and operation of skill gaming terminals at licensed establishments.(b) Minimum requirements.--At a minimum, the applicant's proposed internal controls and audit protocols shall:(1) Safeguard its assets and revenues, including the recording of cash and cash equivalents and evidences of indebtedness related to the skill gaming terminals.(2) Provide for reliable records, accounts and reports of a financial event that occurs in the operation of a skill gaming terminal, including reports to the board related to the skill gaming terminals.20250SB0756PN0796 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Ensure that each skill gaming terminal directly provides or communicates all required activities and financial details to the central control computer system as set by the board and the department.(4) Provide for accurate and reliable financial records.(5) Ensure that a financial event that occurs in the operation of a skill gaming terminal is performed only in accordance with the management's general or specific authorization, as approved by the board.(6) Ensure that a financial event that occurs in the operation of a skill gaming terminal is recorded adequately to permit proper and timely reporting of gross revenue and the calculation thereof and of fees and taxes and to maintain accountability for assets.(7) Ensure that access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's specific authorization, as approved by the board.(8) Ensure that recorded accountability for assets is compared with actual assets at intervals as required by the board and appropriate action is taken with respect to discrepancies.(9) Ensure that all functions, duties and responsibilities are appropriately segregated and performed in accordance with sound financial practices by competent, qualified personnel.(10) Meet any other requirement of the board or the department.(c) Internal control.--A terminal operator license applicant shall submit to the board and department, in such manner as the board requires, a description of its administrative and 20250SB0756PN0796 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accounting procedures in detail, including its written system of internal control. The written system of internal control shall include:(1) Records of direct and indirect ownership in the proposed terminal operator licensee, its affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company.(2) An organizational chart depicting appropriate segregation of employee functions and responsibilities.(3) A description of the duties and responsibilities of each employee position shown on the organizational chart.(4) A detailed narrative description of the administrative and accounting procedures designed to satisfy the requirements of this section.(5) Record retention policy.(6) Procedure to ensure that assets are safeguarded, including mandatory count procedures.(7) A statement signed by the chief financial officer of the terminal operator license applicant or other competent person and the chief executive officer of the terminal operator license applicant or other competent person attesting that the officer believes, in good faith, that the system satisfies the requirements of this section.(8) Other items that the board or department may require in its discretion.§ 5519. Multiple licenses prohibited.(a) Manufacturer restriction.--A manufacturer licensee under this part may not hold an establishment license under this part or a terminal operator license under this part, and may not own, manage or control any establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee.20250SB0756PN0796 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) (Reserved).(c) Terminal operator restriction.--A terminal operator licensee under this part may not hold an establishment license under this part or a manufacturer license under this part, and may not own, manage or control a terminal operator licensee or an establishment licensee.(d) Establishment restriction.--An establishment licensee under this part may not hold a manufacturer license under this part or terminal operator license under this part, and may not own, manage or control a manufacturer licensee or a terminal operator licensee.(e) Existing licenses.--Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit a person or entity that has been approved by the board for licensure under Part II (relating to gaming) or III (relating to video gaming) from applying for and receiving a license under this part.CHAPTER 57OPERATIONSec.5701. Testing and certification of terminals.5702. Skill gaming limitations.5703. (Reserved).5704. Terminal placement agreements.5705. Duties of licensees.5706. Compulsive and problem gambling.§ 5701. Testing and certification of terminals.(a) Requirement for testing.--A skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal or associated equipment may not be made available for use in this Commonwealth prior to being tested and certified by the board in accordance with this section.20250SB0756PN0796 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Skill gaming terminal specifications.--Skill gaming terminals shall be tested and certified to meet the following specifications:(1) The skill gaming terminal shall have the ability to be linked to the central control computer.(2) The skill gaming terminal shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the skill gaming terminal. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer licensee and the serial and model numbers of the skill gaming terminal.(3) The skill gaming terminal shall prominently display the rules of play either on the skill gaming terminal face or screen.(4) The skill gaming terminal may not have the ability to dispense cash, tokens or anything of value, except redemption tickets which shall only be exchangeable for cash at a redemption terminal or reinserted into another skill gaming terminal located in the same skill gaming area as the skill gaming terminal.(5) The cost of a credit shall only be 1¢, 5¢, 10¢ or 25¢.(6) The maximum wager per individual game shall not exceed $5.(7) The maximum prize per individual game shall not exceed $1,000.(8) The skill gaming terminal shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to include gross proceeds, net profits, winning percentages and other information the board requires.20250SB0756PN0796 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Any portion or phase of a game offered by a skill gaming terminal that is predominantly based on chance shall pay out a minimum of 85% of the amount wagered for that portion or phase of the game.(10) Other specifications the board requires.(c) Redemption terminal specifications.--Redemption terminals shall be tested and certified to meet the following specifications:(1) The redemption terminal shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the redemption terminal. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer licensee and the serial and model numbers of the redemption terminal.(2) The redemption terminal shall only accept redemption tickets from skill gaming terminals located in the same skill gaming area.(3) The redemption terminal shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to record information the board requires.(4) Other specifications the board requires.(d) Private testing.--The board may, in its discretion, rely upon the certification of a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal that has met the testing and certification standards of one or more board-approved independent private testing and certification facilities.(e) Testing and certification fee.--(1) A fee for the testing and certification of a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal shall be paid by the manufacturer licensee submitting the terminal, which fee 20250SB0756PN0796 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be an amount established by the board according to a schedule adopted by the board.(2) Fees established by the board shall be exempt from any fee limitation contained in section 4101 (relating to fees).(f) Central control computer compatibility.--The board shall ensure that all skill gaming terminals certified and approved for use in this Commonwealth are compatible and comply with the central control computer and protocol specifications approved by the department.§ 5702. Skill gaming limitations.(a) Establishment licensee limitations.--An establishment licensee may offer skill gaming terminals for play within its premises, subject to the following:(1) No more than two skill gaming terminals may be placed on the premises of an establishment licensee that meets either of the following:(i) a location authorized to sell Pennsylvania Lottery tickets or shares under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law; or(ii) is a licensed premises approved by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board for the sale of liquor, alcohol or malt or brewed beverages under any of the following license categories, limited to licenses in either active or safekeeping status:(A) Brewery.(B) Brewery pub.(C) Brewery storage.(D) Hotel (liquor).(E) Hotel (malt).20250SB0756PN0796 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) Restaurant.(G) Distributor (malt).(H) Importing distributor (malt).(I) Eating place retail dispenser (malt).(2) No more than four skill gaming terminals may be placed on the premises of an establishment licensee that is a licensed premises approved by the Pennsylvania Liquor Control Board for the sale of liquor, alcohol or malt or brewed beverages under any of the following license categories, limited to licenses in either active or safekeeping status:(i) Catering club (liquor).(ii) Club (liquor).(iii) Club (malt).(3) Redemption tickets shall only be exchanged for cash through a redemption terminal or reinserted into another skill gaming terminal in the same skill gaming area or as otherwise authorized by the board in the event of a failure or malfunction in a redemption terminal, and at least one redemption terminal shall be located in the skill gaming area.(4) Skill gaming terminals located on the premises of the establishment licensee shall be placed and operated by a terminal operator licensee pursuant to a terminal placement agreement.(5) The skill gaming area shall be easily seen and observed by at least one employee of the establishment licensee.(6) The skill gaming area shall, at all times, be monitored through video surveillance.(7) No establishment licensee may provide an incentive.20250SB0756PN0796 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) No minor shall be permitted to play a skill gaming terminal or enter the skill gaming area.(9) No visibly intoxicated person shall be permitted to play a skill gaming terminal.(10) No establishment licensee may extend credit or accept a credit card or debit card for play of a skill gaming terminal.(11) No establishment licensee may make structural alterations or significant renovations to a skill gaming area unless the establishment licensee has notified the terminal operator licensee and obtained prior approval from the board.(12) No establishment licensee may move or disconnect a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal from its power source or from the central control computer after installation by a terminal operator licensee.(b) Terminal operator licensee limitations.--A terminal operator licensee may place and operate skill gaming terminals on the premises of an establishment licensee, subject to the following:(1) Redemption tickets shall only be exchanged for cash through a redemption terminal located within the same skill gaming area or reinserted into another skill gaming terminal located in the same skill gaming area as the skill gaming terminal.(2) Skill gaming terminals located on the premises of the establishment licensee shall be placed and operated pursuant to a terminal placement agreement.(3) No terminal operator licensee may provide an incentive.(4) No terminal operator licensee may extend credit or 20250SB0756PN0796 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accept a credit card or debit card for play of a skill gaming terminal.(5) No terminal operator licensee may give or offer to give, directly or indirectly, any type of inducement to a skill gaming establishment to secure or maintain a terminal placement agreement.(6) A terminal operator licensee shall only operate, install or otherwise make available for public use a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal that has been obtained from a manufacturer licensee.(7) No terminal operator licensee may make structural alterations or significant renovations to a skill gaming area unless the terminal operator licensee has notified the establishment licensee and obtained prior approval from the board.(8) No terminal operator licensee may move a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal after installation unless prior approval is obtained from the board.(9) An establishment licensee must employ at least one gaming manager.§ 5703. (Reserved).§ 5704. Terminal placement agreements.(a) Requirement for agreement.--A terminal operator licensee may not place and operate skill gaming terminals on the premises of an establishment licensee unless pursuant to a terminal placement agreement approved by the board and executed no less than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection. Approval shall be presented upon connection of one or more skill gaming terminals at the establishment licensee to the central control computer.20250SB0756PN0796 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Form of agreement.--The board shall establish through regulation minimum standards for terminal placement agreements.(c) Length of agreement.--Terminal placement agreements shall be valid for a minimum 24-month term but shall not exceed a 60-month term.(d) Provisions required.--A terminal placement agreement shall include a provision that:(1) Renders the agreement invalid if either the terminal operator license or terminal operator application or the establishment license or establishment licensee application is denied, revoked, not renewed, withdrawn or surrendered.(2) Identifies who solicited the terminal placement agreement on behalf of a terminal operator licensee or applicant.(e) Parties to agreement.--Only an establishment licensee or applicant may sign or agree to sign a terminal placement agreement with an applicant for a terminal operator license or a terminal operator licensee.(f) Void agreements.--An agreement entered into by an eligible skill gaming establishment prior to 180 days after the effective date of this subsection with a person for the placement, operation, service or maintenance of skill gaming terminals, including an agreement granting a person the right to enter into an agreement or match any offer made after the effective date of this subsection, shall be void and may not be approved by the board.(g) Transferability of agreements.--A terminal placement agreement may not be transferred or assigned unless the person making the assignment is either a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee and the person receiving the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assignment of the terminal placement agreement is either a terminal operator applicant or terminal operator licensee under this chapter.§ 5705. Duties of licensees.A person issued a license under this part shall:(1) Provide assistance or information required by the board, the bureau, the department or law enforcement, and cooperate in inquiries, investigations and hearings.(2) Consent to inspections, searches and seizures.(3) Inform the board of actions that the person believes would constitute a violation of this part.(4) Inform the board of arrests for violations of offenses enumerated under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(5) Report illegal or unlicensed games or devices to the board and to law enforcement.§ 5706. Compulsive and problem gambling.(a) Required posting.--(1) An establishment licensee shall conspicuously post signs similar to the following statement:If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available. Call (toll-free telephone number) or text (toll-free telephone number).(2) At least one sign shall be posted within the skill gaming area and at least one sign shall be posted within five feet of each automated teller machine located within the establishment licensee's premises, if applicable.(b) Toll-free telephone number.--The toll-free telephone number required to be posted in subsection (a) shall be the same number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs 20250SB0756PN0796 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or successor agency under section 5310 (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(c) Problem gambling information.--(1) An establishment licensee shall have available on the premises access to materials regarding compulsive and problem gambling assistance.(2) The available materials required by paragraph (1) shall be a uniform, Statewide handout developed by the board in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency.(3) The available materials required by paragraph (1) shall be displayed conspicuously at least within the skill gaming area.(d) Mandatory training.--(1) The board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling, in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency, shall develop a mandatory training program for employees and management of an establishment licensee who oversee the establishment licensee's skill gaming area. The training program shall address responsible gaming and other compulsive and problem gambling issues related to skill gaming terminals.(2) The board shall establish a fee to cover the cost of the mandatory training program.(e) Penalty.--An establishment licensee that fails to fulfill the requirements of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) shall be assessed by the board an administrative penalty in an amount established by the board in its discretion, and may have its establishment license suspended.CHAPTER 5920250SB0756PN0796 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ENFORCEMENTSec.5901. Exclusion or ejection of certain persons.5902. Repeat offenders.5903. Self-exclusion.5904. Investigations and enforcement.5905. Prohibited acts and penalties.5906. Report of suspicious transactions.5907. Additional authority.5908. Detention.§ 5901. Exclusion or ejection of certain persons.(a) Exclusion requirement.--The board shall by regulation provide for the establishment of a list of individuals who are to be excluded or ejected from the skill gaming area of an establishment licensee. The provisions shall define the standards for exclusion and shall include standards relating to individuals who are career or professional offenders as defined by regulations of the board or whose presence in a skill gaming area would, in the opinion of the board, be inimical to the interest of the Commonwealth or of licensed skill gaming in this Commonwealth, or both.(b) Categories to be defined.--The board shall promulgate regulations with definitions establishing categories of individuals who shall be excluded or ejected under this section, including cheats and persons whose privileges for licensure, certification, permit or registration have been revoked.(c) Discrimination prohibited.--Race, color, creed, national origin or ancestry or sex shall not be a reason for placing the name of a person upon a list under this section.(d) Prevention of access.--The board shall, in consultation 20250SB0756PN0796 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with terminal operator licensees and establishment licensees, develop policies and procedures to reasonably prevent individuals on the list required by this section from entering a skill gaming area.(e) Sanctions.--The board may impose sanctions upon an establishment licensee in accordance with this part if the establishment licensee knowingly fails to implement the policies and procedures established by the board under subsection (d).(f) List not all-inclusive.--A list compiled by the board under this section shall not be deemed an all-inclusive list, and an establishment licensee shall keep from the skill gaming area individuals known to the establishment licensee to be within the classifications declared in this section and the regulations promulgated under this section whose presence in a skill gaming area would be inimical to the interest of the Commonwealth or of licensed skill gaming in this Commonwealth, or both, as defined in standards established by the board.(g) Notice.--If the bureau decides to place the name of a person on a list under this section, the bureau shall serve notice of the decision to the person by personal service or certified mail at the last known address of the person. The notice shall inform the person of the right to request a hearing under subsection (h).(h) Hearing.--(1) Within 30 days after receipt of notice under subsection (g), the person named for exclusion or ejection may demand a hearing before the board, at which hearing the bureau must demonstrate that the person named for exclusion or ejection satisfies the criteria for exclusion or ejection established by this section and the board's regulations.20250SB0756PN0796 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Failure of the person to demand a hearing within 30 days after service shall be deemed an admission of all matters and facts alleged in the bureau's notice and shall preclude the person from having an administrative hearing, but shall in no way affect the right to judicial review as provided in this section.(i) Review.--(1) If, upon completion of a hearing on the notice of exclusion or ejection, the board determines that placement of the name of the person on the exclusion or ejection list is appropriate, the board shall make and enter an order to that effect.(2) The order shall be subject to review by Commonwealth Court in accordance with the rules of court.§ 5902. Repeat offenders.(a) Discretion to exclude or eject.--An establishment licensee may exclude or eject from the establishment licensee's skill gaming area or premises an individual who is known to have been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony committed in or on the premises of a licensed establishment.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this section or in any other law of this Commonwealth shall be construed to limit the right of an establishment licensee to exercise its common law right to exclude or eject permanently from its skill gaming area or premises an individual who:(1) disrupts the operations of its premises;(2) threatens the security of its premises or its occupants; or(3) is disorderly or intoxicated.§ 5903. Self-exclusion.20250SB0756PN0796 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment of list.--(1) The board shall provide by regulation for the establishment of a list of individuals self-excluded from skill gaming activities within specific establishment licensees or establishment licensees in geographic areas of the Commonwealth.(2) An individual may request placement on the list of self-excluded individuals by:(i) acknowledging in a manner to be established by the board that the individual is a problem gambler;(ii) agreeing that, during any period of voluntary exclusion, the individual may not collect any winnings or recover any losses resulting from any skill gaming activity within establishment licensees and that individual may be subject to arrest for trespass; and(iii) agreeing to another condition established by the board.(b) Regulations.--The regulations of the board shall establish:(1) Procedures for placement on and removal from the list of a self-excluded individual.(2) Procedures for the transmittal to establishment licensees of identifying information concerning a self-excluded individual and shall require establishment licensees to establish reasonable procedures designed at a minimum to prevent entry of a self-excluded individual into the skill gaming area of an establishment licensee, provided that the board may not require skill gaming terminals to be equipped with identification card-reading devices or require establishment licensees to purchase identification card-20250SB0756PN0796 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reading devices.(3) Procedures for the transmittal to terminal operator licensees of identifying information concerning a self-excluded individual and shall require terminal operator licensees to establish procedures to remove self-excluded individuals from customer loyalty or reward card programs and targeted mailings or other forms of advertising or promotions.(c) Liability.--An establishment licensee or employee thereof shall not be liable to a self-excluded individual or to another party in a judicial proceeding for harm, monetary or otherwise, which may arise as a result of:(1) the failure of the establishment licensee to withhold skill gaming privileges from or restore skill gaming privileges to the self-excluded individual; or(2) otherwise permitting or not permitting the self-excluded individual to engage in skill gaming activity within the establishment licensee's premises while on the list of self-excluded individuals.(d) Nondisclosure.--The board's list of self-excluded individuals shall not be open to public inspection.§ 5904. Investigations and enforcement.(a) Bureau of Investigation and Enforcement, Skill Gaming.--The board shall establish the Skill Gaming Division within the bureau, which shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Enforce the provisions of this part.(2) Investigate and review applicants and applications for a license or registration. The bureau shall be prohibited from disclosing any portion of a background investigation report to a member of the board prior to the submission of 20250SB0756PN0796 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the bureau's final background investigation report relating to the applicant's suitability for licensure to the board. The Skill Gaming Division of the Office of Enforcement Counsel shall prepare the final background investigation report for inclusion in a final report relating to the applicant's suitability for licensure.(3) Investigate licensees, registrants and other persons regulated by the board under this part for noncriminal violations, including potential violations referred to the bureau by the board or other person.(4) Monitor skill gaming operations to ensure compliance with this part.(5) Inspect and examine licensed entities. Inspections may include the review and reproduction of documents or records.(6) Conduct reviews of a licensed entity as necessary to ensure compliance with this part. A review may include the review of accounting, administrative and financial records, management control systems, procedures and other records utilized by a licensed entity.(7) Refer possible criminal violations related to this title or 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) to law enforcement. The bureau shall not have the power of arrest.(8) Cooperate in the investigation and prosecution of criminal violations related to this part.(9) Be a criminal justice agency under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(b) Office of Enforcement Counsel, Skill Gaming Division.--The board shall establish the Skill Gaming Division within the Office of Enforcement Counsel, which shall act as the prosecutor 20250SB0756PN0796 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in all noncriminal enforcement actions initiated by the bureau under this part and shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Advise the bureau on all matters related to skill gaming, including the granting of licenses or registrations, the conduct of background investigations, audits and inspections and the investigation of potential violations of this part.(2) File on behalf of the bureau recommendations and objections relating to the issuance of licenses and registrations under this part.(3) Initiate, in its sole discretion, proceedings for noncriminal violations of this part by filing a complaint or other pleading with the board.(c) Powers and duties of department.--(1) The department shall at all times have the power of access to examine and audit equipment and records relating to all aspects of the operation of skill gaming terminals and redemption terminals under this part.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 353(f) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the department shall supply the board, the bureau, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General with information concerning the status of delinquent taxes owed by applicants or licensees.(d) Powers and duties of the Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Promptly conduct background investigations on persons as directed by the board under this part. The Pennsylvania State Police may contract with other law 20250SB0756PN0796 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement annuitants to assist in the conduct of investigations under this paragraph.(2) Initiate proceedings for criminal violations of this part.(3) Provide the board with all information necessary for all actions under this part for all proceedings involving criminal enforcement of this part.(4) Inspect, when appropriate, a licensee's person and personal effects present within an establishment licensee's premises under this part while that licensee is present.(5) Enforce the criminal provisions of this part and all other criminal laws of this Commonwealth.(6) Fingerprint applicants.(7) Exchange fingerprint data with and receive national criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation for use in background investigations performed by the bureau under this part.(8) Receive and take appropriate action on any referral from the bureau relating to criminal conduct.(9) Conduct administrative inspections on the premises of an establishment licensee at times, under circumstances and to the extent the bureau determines to ensure compliance with this part and the regulations of the board and, in the course of inspections, review and make copies of all documents and records required by the inspection through onsite observation and other reasonable means to assure compliance with this part and regulations promulgated thereunder.(10) Conduct audits or verification of information of skill gaming terminal operations at times, under 20250SB0756PN0796 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 circumstances and to the extent as the bureau determines. This paragraph includes the review of accounting, administrative and financial records and management control systems, procedures and records utilized by a terminal operator licensee.(11) Report violations of this part to the bureau that are found during the normal course of duties required under any law of this Commonwealth.(e) Powers and duties of Attorney General.--The gaming unit within the Office of Attorney General shall investigate and institute criminal proceedings as authorized under subsection (f).(f) Criminal action.--(1) County district attorneys shall have the authority to investigate and to institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this part.(2) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and, following consultation with the appropriate district attorney, to institute criminal proceedings for a violation of this part or under Title 18.(3) A person charged with a violation of this part by the Attorney General shall not have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or prosecute the case, and, if any such challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person making the challenge.20250SB0756PN0796 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Regulatory action.--Nothing contained in subsection (e) shall be construed to limit the existing regulatory or investigative authority of an agency or the Commonwealth whose functions relate to persons or matters within the scope of this part.(h) Inspection, seizure and warrants.--(1) The board, the bureau, the department and the Pennsylvania State Police shall have the authority without notice and without warrant to do all of the following in the performance of their duties under this part:(i) Inspect and examine all premises where:(A) skill gaming operations are conducted;(B) skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals and associated equipment are manufactured, sold, distributed or serviced; and(C) records of these activities are prepared or maintained.(ii) Inspect all equipment and supplies in, about, upon or around premises referred to in subparagraph (i).(iii) Seize, summarily remove and impound equipment and supplies from premises referred to in subparagraph (i) for the purposes of examination and inspection.(iv) Inspect, examine and audit all books, records and documents pertaining to a terminal operator licensee's skill gaming operation.(v) Seize, impound or assume physical control of any book, record, ledger or device related to skill gaming operations or the skill gaming terminals or redemption terminals.(2) The provisions of paragraph (1) shall not be 20250SB0756PN0796 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construed to limit warrantless inspections, except in accordance with constitutional requirements.(3) To further effectuate the purposes of this part, the bureau and the Pennsylvania State Police may obtain administrative warrants for the inspection and seizure of property possessed, controlled, bailed or otherwise held by an applicant, licensee, intermediary, subsidiary, affiliate or holding company.(i) Information sharing and enforcement referral.--With respect to the administration, supervision and enforcement of this part, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General may obtain or provide pertinent information regarding applicants or licensees from or to law enforcement entities or gaming authorities of the Commonwealth and other domestic, foreign or federally approved jurisdictions, including the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and may transmit the information to each other electronically.§ 5905. Prohibited acts and penalties.(a) Criminal offenses.--(1) The provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902 (relating to perjury), 4903 (relating to false swearing) or 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) shall apply to a person providing information or making a statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General, as required by this part.(2) It shall be unlawful for a person to willfully:(i) fail to report, pay or truthfully account for and pay over a license fee, authorization fee, tax or assessment imposed under this part; or20250SB0756PN0796 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) attempt in any manner to evade or defeat a license fee, authorization fee, tax or assessment imposed under this part.(3) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity, gaming employee, key employee or any other person to permit a skill gaming terminal to be operated, transported, repaired or opened on the premises of an establishment licensee by a person other than a person licensed or permitted by the board under this part.(4) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity or other person to manufacture, supply or place skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment into play or display skill gaming terminals, redemption terminals or associated equipment on the premises of an establishment licensee without the authority of the board.(5) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity or other person to manufacture, supply, operate, carry on or expose for play a skill gaming terminal or associated equipment after the person's license has expired or failed to be renewed in accordance with this part.(6) It shall be unlawful for an individual while on the premises of an establishment licensee to knowingly use currency other than lawful coin or legal tender of the United States or a coin not of the same denomination as the coin intended to be used in the skill gaming terminal or use counterfeit or altered redemption tickets with the intent to cheat or defraud a terminal operator licensee or the Commonwealth or damage the skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal.(7) (i) Except as specified in subparagraph (ii), it 20250SB0756PN0796 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be unlawful for an individual to use or possess a cheating or thieving device, counterfeit or altered billet, ticket, token or similar object accepted by a skill gaming terminal or counterfeit or altered redemption ticket on the premises of an establishment licensee.(ii) An authorized employee of a licensee or an employee of the board may possess and use a cheating or thieving device, counterfeit or altered billet, ticket, token or similar object accepted by a skill gaming terminal or counterfeit or altered redemption ticket in performance of the duties of employment.(8) (i) Except as specified in subparagraph (ii), it shall be unlawful for an individual to knowingly possess or use while on the premises of an establishment licensee a key or device designed for the purpose of and suitable for opening or entering a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal that is located on the premises of the establishment licensee.(ii) An authorized employee of a licensee or a member of the board may possess and use a device referred to in subparagraph (i) in the performance of the duties of employment.(9) It shall be unlawful for a person or licensed entity to possess a device, equipment or material which the person or licensed entity knows has been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced in violation of this part with the intent to use the device, equipment or material as though it had been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced under this part.20250SB0756PN0796 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) It shall be unlawful for a person to sell, offer for sale, represent or pass off as lawful any device, equipment or material that the person or licensed entity knows has been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with or serviced in violation of this part.(11) It shall be unlawful for an individual to work or be employed in a position the duties of which would require licensing under this part without first obtaining the requisite license issued under this part.(12) It shall be unlawful for a licensed entity to employ or continue to employ an individual in a position the duties of which require a license under this part if the individual:(i) Is not licensed under this part.(ii) Is prohibited from accepting employment from a licensee.(13) It shall be unlawful for a minor to wager, play or attempt to play a skill gaming terminal or submit a redemption ticket into a redemption terminal.(14) It shall be unlawful for a terminal operator licensee to require a skill gaming terminal wager to be greater than the stated minimum wager or greater than the stated maximum wager.(15) An individual who engages in conduct prohibited by 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 (relating to purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of liquor or malt or brewed beverages) on the premises of an establishment licensee commits a nongambling offense.(16) It shall be unlawful for an individual to claim, collect or take, or attempt to claim, collect or take, money 20250SB0756PN0796 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or anything of value in or from a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal with the intent to defraud, or to claim, collect or take an amount greater than the amount won, or to manipulate with the intent to cheat, a component of a skill gaming terminal or redemption terminal in a manner contrary to the designed and normal operational purpose.(17) It shall be unlawful for a person to manufacture, place, offer or play in this Commonwealth an illegal gambling device as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 (relating to gambling devices, gambling, etc.)(b) Criminal penalties and fines.--(1) (i) A person that commits a first offense in violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902, 4903 or 4904 in connection with providing information or making any statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or a district attorney as required by this part, commits an offense to be graded in accordance with the applicable section violated. A person that is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4902, 4903 or 4904 in connection with providing information or making any statement, whether written or oral, to the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or a district attorney as required by this part, commits a felony of the second degree.(ii) A person that violates subsection (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17) commits a misdemeanor of the first degree. A person that is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of 20250SB0756PN0796 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17) commits a felony of the second degree.(2) (i) For a first violation of subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not less than $75,000 nor more than $150,000 if the person is an individual or establishment licensee;(B) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a terminal operator licensee; or(C) not less than $150,000 nor more than $300,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation of subsection (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (17), a person shall be sentenced to pay a fine of:(A) not less than $150,000 nor more than $300,000 if the person is an individual or establishment licensee;(B) not less than $600,000 nor more than $1,200,000 if the person is a terminal operator licensee; or(C) not less than $300,000 nor more than $600,000 if the person is a licensed manufacturer or supplier.(3) An individual who commits an offense in violation of subsection (a)(13) or (14) commits a nongambling summary 20250SB0756PN0796 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offense and upon conviction of a first offense shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $200 nor more than $1,000. An individual who is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under subsection (a)(13) or (14) shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $1,500. In addition to the fine imposed, an individual convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(13) or (14) may be sentenced to perform a period of community service not to exceed 40 hours.(4) An individual who commits an offense in violation of subsection (a)(16) commits a nongambling offense to be graded in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 and shall be subject to the same penalties imposed under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6308 except that the fine imposed for a violation of subsection (a)(16) shall be not less than $350 nor more than $1,000.(c) Board-imposed administrative sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the board may impose without limitation the following sanctions:(i) Revoke the license of a person convicted of a criminal offense under this part or regulations promulgated under this part or committing any other offense or violation of this part or applicable law that would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license.(ii) Revoke the license of a person determined to have violated a provision of this part or regulations promulgated under this part that would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license.(iii) Revoke the license of a person for willfully 20250SB0756PN0796 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and knowingly violating or attempting to violate an order of the board directed to the person.(iv) Subject to subsection (g), assess administrative penalties as necessary to punish violations of this part.(v) Order restitution of money or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a licensee.(vi) Enter cease and desist orders which specify the conduct which is to be discontinued, altered or implemented by a licensee.(vii) Issue letters of reprimand or censure, which letters shall be made a permanent part of the file of the licensee so sanctioned.(2) (i) If the board refuses to issue or renew a license, suspends or revokes a license, assesses civil penalties, orders restitution, enters a cease and desist order or issues a letter of reprimand or censure, the board shall provide the applicant or licensee with written notification of its decision, including a statement of the reasons for its decision, by certified mail within 10 business days of the decision of the board.(ii) The applicant or licensee shall have the right to appeal the decision in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(d) Aiding and abetting.--A person who aids, abets, counsels, commands, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this part shall be subject to all sanctions and 20250SB0756PN0796 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties, both civil and criminal, provided under this part.(e) Continuing offenses.--A violation of this part that is determined to be an offense of a continuing nature shall be deemed to be a separate offense on each event or day during which the violation occurs.(f) Property subject to seizure, confiscation, destruction or forfeiture.--(1) Any equipment, device or apparatus, money, material, gaming proceeds or substituted proceeds or real or personal property used, obtained or received or an attempt to use, obtain or receive the device, apparatus, money, material, proceeds or real or personal property in violation of this part or in violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513 shall be subject to the provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803(a), (b), (b.1), (c), (d), (e), (f), (f.1), (j), (k), (k.1) and (l) (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions).(2) Cash or proceeds of property subject to forfeiture under this section shall be distributed as follows:(i) Fifty percent to the local law enforcement authority that seized the cash or proceeds.(ii) Fifty percent to the local district attorney office in the county in which the seized property was located.(g) Penalty limitation.--(1) Administrative penalties assessed by the board on an establishment licensee shall not exceed $5,000 for each 20250SB0756PN0796 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 noncriminal violation of this part.(2) When imposing an administrative penalty on an establishment licensee for a noncriminal violation of this part or Part III (relating to video gaming), the board shall take into consideration the establishment licensee's annual taxable income and whether the penalty amount would cause the establishment licensee to cease nonskill gaming operations.(h) Deposit of fines.--Fines imposed and collected by the board under subsection (c) shall be deposited into the General Fund.§ 5906. Report of suspicious transactions.(a) Duty.--An establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee or a person acting on behalf of an establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee shall, on a form and in a manner as required by the bureau, notify the bureau of a suspicious transaction.(b) Failure to report.--(1) A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and knowingly fails to file the report or that knowingly causes another person having that responsibility to fail to file the report commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A person required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and fails to file the report or a person that causes another person required under this section to file a report and fails to file the report shall be strictly liable for the person's actions and may be subject to sanctions under section 5905(c) (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).(c) Bureau.--The bureau shall maintain a record of all 20250SB0756PN0796 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reports made under this section for a period of five years. The bureau shall make the reports available to any Federal or State law enforcement agency upon written request and without necessity of subpoena.(d) Notice prohibited.--(1) A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section may not notify an individual suspected of committing the suspicious transaction that the transaction has been reported.(2) A person that violates this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and may be subject to sanctions under section 5905(c).(e) Immunity.--A person that is required to file a report of a suspicious transaction under this section and in good faith makes the report shall not be liable in any civil action brought by a person for making the report, regardless of whether the transaction is later determined to be a suspicious transaction.(f) Sanctions.--(1) In considering appropriate administrative sanctions against a person for violating this section, the board shall consider all of the following:(i) The risk to the public and to the integrity of gaming operations created by the conduct of the person.(ii) The seriousness of the conduct of the person and whether the conduct was purposeful and with knowledge that it was in contravention of the provisions of this part or regulations promulgated under this part.(iii) Justification or excuse for the conduct by the person.(iv) The prior history of the particular licensee or 20250SB0756PN0796 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person involved with respect to skill gaming terminal activity.(v) The corrective action taken by the establishment licensee or terminal operator licensee to prevent future misconduct of a like nature from occurring.(vi) In the case of a monetary penalty, the amount of the penalty in relation to the severity of the misconduct and the financial means of the licensee or person. The board may impose any schedule or terms of payment of the penalty as it may deem appropriate.(2) It shall not be a defense to disciplinary action before the board that a person inadvertently, unintentionally or unknowingly violated this section. The factors enumerated under paragraph (1) shall only apply to the degree of the penalty to be imposed by the board and not to a finding of a violation itself.(g) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.§ 5907. Additional authority.(a) Petition for access to agency information.--(1) The director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel within the bureau may petition a court of record having jurisdiction over information in the possession of an agency in this Commonwealth or, if there is no court of record, Commonwealth Court for authorization to review or obtain information in the possession of an agency in this Commonwealth by averring specific facts demonstrating that:(i) The agency has in its possession information material to a pending investigation or inquiry being conducted by the bureau under this part.20250SB0756PN0796 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Disclosure or release of the information is in the best interest of the Commonwealth.(2) The petition shall request that the court enter a rule upon the agency to show cause why the agency should not be directed to disclose to the bureau, or identified agents thereof, information in the agency's possession about any pending matter under the jurisdiction of the bureau under this part.(3) If the respondent is a local agency, a copy of a rule issued under this section shall be provided to the district attorney of the county in which the local agency is located and the Office of Attorney General.(4) Upon request of a local agency, the district attorney or the Attorney General may elect to enter an appearance to represent the local agency in the proceedings.(b) Procedure.--(1) The filing of a petition under this section and related proceedings shall be in accordance with court rule, including issuance as of course.(2) A party to the proceeding may not disclose the filing of a petition or answer or the receipt, content or disposition of a rule or order issued under this section, without leave of court.(3) A party to the proceedings may request that the record be sealed and proceedings be closed. The court shall grant the request if it is in the best interest of a person or the Commonwealth to do so.(c) Court determination.--(1) Following review of the record, the court shall grant the relief sought by the director of the Office of 20250SB0756PN0796 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Enforcement Counsel if the court determines that:(i) The agency has in its possession information material to the investigation or inquiry.(ii) Disclosure or release of the information is in the best interest of the Commonwealth.(iii) The disclosure or release of the information is not otherwise prohibited by statute or regulation.(iv) The disclosure or release of the information would not inhibit an agency in the performance of the agency's duties.(2) If the court grants relief under paragraph (1), the court shall enter an order authorizing and directing the information be made available for review in camera.(d) Release of materials or information.--(1) If, after an in camera review by the court, the director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel seeks to obtain copies of materials in the agency's possession, the court may, if not otherwise prohibited by statute or regulation, enter an order that the requested materials be provided.(2) An order authorizing the release of materials or other information shall contain direction regarding the safekeeping and use of the materials or other information sufficient to satisfy the court that the materials or information will be sufficiently safeguarded.(3) In making the determination under paragraph (2), the court shall consider input of the agency in possession of the information and input from an agency with which the information originated concerning a pending investigation or ongoing matter and the safety of person and property.(e) Modification of order.--20250SB0756PN0796 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) If subsequent investigation or inquiry by the bureau warrants modification of an order entered under this section, the director of the Office of Enforcement Counsel may petition to request modification of the order.(2) Upon the request, the court may modify the order at any time and in any manner it deems necessary and appropriate.(3) The agency named in the original petition shall be given notice and an opportunity to be heard.(f) Use of information or materials.--A person who, by any means authorized by this section, has obtained knowledge of information or materials solely under this section may use the information or materials in a manner consistent with any direction imposed by the court and appropriate to the proper performance of the person's duties under this part.(g) Violation.--In addition to the remedies and penalties provided in this part, a violation of the provisions of this section may be punished as contempt of court.(h) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "agency" shall mean a "Commonwealth agency" or a "local agency" as those terms are defined in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 5908. Detention.(a) Reasonable detention.--A peace officer who has probable cause to believe a criminal violation of this part has occurred or is occurring on or about an establishment licensee's premises and who has probable cause to believe a specific individual has committed or is committing a criminal violation may detain the individual in a reasonable manner for a reasonable time on the premises of the establishment licensee to require the suspect to 20250SB0756PN0796 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identify himself or herself, to verify such identification.(b) Immunity.--A peace officer shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for detention of an individual in accordance with subsection (a).CHAPTER 61REVENUESSec.6101. Fees.6102. Taxes and assessments.6103. (Reserved).6104. Regulatory assessments.6105. Transfers from Skill Gaming Fund.§ 6101. Fees.(a) Application fees.--The following nonrefundable application fees shall accompany an application for the following licenses or permits applied for under Chapter 55 (relating to application and licensure):(1) For a manufacturer license, $50,000.(2) For a terminal operator license, $25,000.(3) For an establishment license, $250.(4) For a key employee or principal license, $500.(5) For any other authorization authorized by this part, an amount established by the board, through regulation, which may not exceed $100.(b) Initial license and renewal fees.--The following nonrefundable fees shall be required upon issuance of an initial license and shall accompany an application for renewal for the following licenses or permits under Chapter 55:(1) For a manufacturer license, $4,000,000.(2) For a terminal operator license, $100,000.20250SB0756PN0796 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) For an establishment license, an amount equal to $250 per each skill gaming terminal in operation at the premises of the establishment licensee.(4) For a key employee, procurement agent license or principal license, $2,000.(5) For any other authorization or license authorized by this part, an amount established by the board, through regulation, which may not exceed $500.(c) Terminal increase fee.--An establishment licensee that increases the total number of skill gaming terminals within the establishment after submission of the renewal fee required in subsection (b) shall provide the board with a $1,000 renewal fee for each additional skill gaming terminal added to the establishment within 60 days of installation of each additional skill gaming terminal.(d) Deposit of fees.--Fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.§ 6102. Taxes and assessments.(a) Fund established.--The Skill Gaming Fund is established in the State Treasury. Money in the Skill Gaming Fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes under subsection (c).(b) Skill gaming terminal tax and assessments.--(1) The department shall determine and each terminal operator licensee shall pay on a bimonthly basis:(i) A tax of 35% of its gross terminal revenue from all skill gaming terminals operated by the terminal operator licensee within this Commonwealth.(ii) A regulatory assessment established in section 6104 (relating to regulatory assessments) from the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminal operator licensee's weekly gross terminal revenue.(2) All money owed under this section shall be held in trust by the terminal operator licensee until the money is paid or transferred to the Skill Gaming Fund.(3) Unless otherwise agreed to by the board, a terminal operator licensee shall establish a separate bank account to maintain gross terminal revenue until the money is paid or transferred under this section.(c) Transfers and distributions.--The department shall:(1) Transfer the tax imposed under subsection (b) to the Skill Gaming Fund.(2) (Reserved).(3) Transfer the regulatory assessment imposed under subsection (b) in accordance with section 6104.§ 6103. (Reserved).§ 6104. Regulatory assessments.(a) Accounts established.--The State Treasurer shall establish within the State Treasury an account for each terminal operator for the deposit of a regulatory assessment amount required under subsection (b) to recover costs or expenses incurred by the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General in carrying out their powers and duties under this part based upon a budget submitted by the department under subsection (c).(b) Bimonthly deposits.--(1) The department shall determine the appropriate assessment amount for each terminal operator licensee, which shall be a percentage assessed on the terminal operator licensee's bimonthly gross terminal revenue.20250SB0756PN0796 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The percentage assessed shall not exceed an amount equal to the costs or expenses incurred by the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General in carrying out their powers and duties under this part based upon a budget submitted by the department under subsection (c).(c) Itemized budget reporting.--(1) The department shall prepare and annually submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives an itemized budget consisting of amounts to be appropriated out of the accounts established under this section necessary to administer this part.(2) As soon as practicable after submitting copies of the itemized budget, the department shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives analyses of and recommendations regarding the itemized budget.(3) The itemized budget required under paragraph (1) shall be submitted in conjunction with the budget required to be submitted under section 1202(b)(28) (relating to general and specific powers).(d) Appropriation.--(1) Costs and expenses may be paid from the accounts established under subsection (a) only upon appropriation by the General Assembly.(2) If the total costs or expenses incurred by the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General exceed the amounts available in the accounts established under subsection (a), the General Assembly may appropriate additional amounts to the board, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Office of Attorney General from the Skill Gaming Fund.§ 6105. Transfers from Skill Gaming Fund.(a) Transfer to Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund.--On June 30, 2026, and on the last day of each fiscal year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer from the Skill Gaming Fund an amount equal to 0.002 multiplied by the total gross terminal revenue of all terminal operator licensees to the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund established in section 1509 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program).(b) Transfer to General Fund.--On June 30, 2026, and on the last day of each fiscal year thereafter, the State Treasurer shall transfer any balance remaining, less the sum transferred under subsection (a), in the Skill Gaming Fund to the General Fund.CHAPTER 63ETHICSSec.6301. Board code of conduct.6302. Additional board restrictions.6303. Financial and employment interests.6304. Additional restrictions.§ 6301. Board code of conduct.(a) Update required.--The board shall update the comprehensive code of conduct established under section 1202.1 20250SB0756PN0796 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to code of conduct) prior to the consideration of a license, permit or other authorization under this part in order to avoid a perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of the board as related to skill gaming. At a minimum, the updated code of conduct adopted under this section shall include registration of licensed entity representatives under subsection (b) and the restrictions under subsection (c) as they relate to skill gaming.(b) Registration.--(1) A licensed entity representative shall register with the board in a manner prescribed by the board. The registration shall include the name, employer or firm, business address and business telephone number of both the licensed entity representative and any licensed entity, applicant for licensure or other person being represented.(2) A licensed entity representative shall update the registration information on an ongoing basis and failure to do so shall be punishable by the board.(3) The board shall maintain a registration list that contains the information required under paragraph (1). The list shall be available on the board's publicly accessible internet website.(c) Restrictions.--In addition to the other prohibitions contained in this part, a member of the board shall:(1) Not accept a discount, gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, from an applicant, licensed entity, affiliate, subsidiary or intermediary of an applicant or a licensed entity, registrant or licensed entity representative.20250SB0756PN0796 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Disclose and recuse the member's self from a hearing or other proceeding in which the member's objectivity, impartiality, integrity or independence of judgment may be reasonably questioned due to the member's relationship or association with a party connected to a hearing or proceeding or a person appearing before the board.(3) Refrain from financial or business dealings that would tend to reflect adversely on the member's objectivity, impartiality or independence of judgment.(4) (i) Not solicit money for a charitable, educational, religious, health, fraternal, civic or other nonprofit entity from an applicant, licensed entity, party, registrant or licensed entity representative or from an affiliate, subsidiary, intermediary or holding company of an applicant, licensed entity, party or licensed entity representative.(ii) Subject to the provisions of section 1201(h)(4.1) (relating to Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board established), a member may serve as an officer, employee or member of the governing body of a nonprofit entity and may attend, make personal contributions to and plan or preside over the entity's fundraising events.(iii) A member may permit their name to appear on the letterhead used for fundraising events if the letterhead contains only the member's name and position with the nonprofit entity.(5) (i) Not meet or engage in discussions with an applicant, licensed entity, registrant, licensed entity representative, person who provides goods, property or services to a terminal operator licensee or another 20250SB0756PN0796 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person under the jurisdiction of the board unless the meeting or discussion occurs on the business premises of the board and is recorded in a log.(ii) The log shall be posted on the board's publicly accessible internet website.(iii) The log must include the date and time of the meeting or discussion, the names of the participants and the subjects discussed.(iv) The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to a meeting that considers matters requiring the physical inspection of the equipment or premises of an applicant or a licensed entity, if the meeting is entered in the log.(6) Avoid impropriety and the appearance of impropriety at all times and observe standards and conduct that promote public confidence in the oversight of skill gaming.(7) Comply with other laws, rules or regulations relating to the conduct of a member.§ 6302. Additional board restrictions.(a) Board restrictions.--The following shall apply to a board member or employee of the board whose duties substantially involve licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy relating to gaming under this part or who has other discretionary authority which may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part:(1) The individual may not, for a period of two years following termination of employment, accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or a licensed entity or by an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an 20250SB0756PN0796 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant or a licensed entity.(2) The individual may not, for a period of two years following termination of employment, appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity.(3) (i) An applicant or a licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity may not, until the expiration of two years following termination of employment, employ or retain the individual.(ii) Violation of this paragraph shall result in termination of the individual's employment and subject the violator to section 5905(c) (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).(4) (i) A prospective employee who, upon employment, would be subject to this subsection must, as a condition of employment, sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate paragraph (1) or (2).(ii) If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the board shall rescind an offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(b) Contractor restrictions.--The following shall apply to an independent contractor of the board and to an employee of an independent contractor whose duties substantially involve consultation relating to licensing, enforcement, development of law, promulgation of regulations or development of policy relating to skill gaming under this part:(1) The person may not, for a period of one year 20250SB0756PN0796 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following termination of the contract with the board, be retained by an applicant or a licensed entity or by an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity.(2) The person may not, for a period of two years following termination of the contract with the board, appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity or on behalf of an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity.(3) (i) An applicant or a licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or a licensed entity may not, until one year following termination of the contract with the board, employ or retain the person.(ii) A knowing violation of this paragraph shall result in termination of the person's employment and subject the violator to section 5905(c).(4) (i) Each contract between the board and an independent contractor that involves the duties specified in this subsection shall contain a provision requiring the independent contractor to sign an affidavit that the independent contractor will not violate paragraph (1) or (2).(ii) If the independent contractor fails to sign the affidavit, the board may not enter into the contract or must terminate the contract.(5) (i) An independent contractor shall require a prospective employee whose employment would involve the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 duties specified in this subsection to sign an affidavit that the prospective employee will not violate paragraph (1) or (2).(ii) If the prospective employee fails to sign the affidavit, the independent contractor shall rescind an offer of employment and may not employ the individual.(c) Construction.--Nothing under subsection (a) or (b) shall be construed to prevent a current or former employee of the board, a current or former independent contractor or a current or former employee of an independent contractor from appearing before the board in a hearing or proceeding as a witness or testifying as to any fact or information.(d) State Ethics Commission.--(1) The State Ethics Commission shall issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a) or (b) upon the written request of the person or the person's employer or potential employer. A person that relies in good faith on a determination issued under this paragraph shall not be subject to a penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) The State Ethics Commission shall publish a list of all employment positions within the board and employment positions within independent contractors whose duties would subject the individuals in those positions to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b).(ii) The board and each independent contractor shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which shall be compiled by the State Ethics Commission and transmitted to the Legislative Reference 20250SB0756PN0796 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Upon request, employees of the board and each independent contractor shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this paragraph.(v) An individual who relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to a penalty for a violation of subsection (a) or (b).§ 6303. Financial and employment interests.(a) Financial interests.--Except as may be provided for the judiciary by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court, an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, may not intentionally or knowingly hold a financial interest in an applicant or a licensee, or in a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(b) Employment.--Except as may be provided by rule or order of the Pennsylvania Supreme Court and except as provided in section 1202.1 (relating to code of conduct), 4304 (relating to 20250SB0756PN0796 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional restrictions) or 6304 (relating to additional restrictions), an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, may not be employed by an applicant or licensee, or by a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary thereof, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for one year following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(c) Complimentary services.--(1) An executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, may not solicit or accept a complimentary service from an applicant or licensee, or from an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, which the executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount which is offered to members of the general public in like circumstances.(2) An applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, may not offer or deliver to an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, a complimentary service from the applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, that the applicant or licensee, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company thereof, knows or has reason to know the service is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general public in like circumstances.(d) Grading.--An individual who violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(e) Divestiture.--(1) An executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member thereof, who holds a financial interest prohibited by this section shall divest the financial interest within three months of the effective date of this section, as applicable.(2) An executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member shall have 30 days from the date the individual knew or had reason to know of the violation or 30 days from the publication on the board's publicly accessible website under section 5301(b)(10) (relating to powers of board) of the application or licensure of the executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member, whichever occurs earlier, to divest the financial interest.(3) The State Ethics Commission may, for good cause, extend the time period under this subsection.(f) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) (i) Issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a), (b) or (c) upon the written request of the person or another person that may have liability for an action taken with respect to the person.(ii) A person that relies in good faith on a 20250SB0756PN0796 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination made under this paragraph shall not be subject to penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) Publish a list of all State, county, municipal and other government positions that meet the definitions of "public official" as defined under subsection (g) or "executive-level public employee" as defined under section 5102 (relating to definitions).(ii) The Office of Administration shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which list shall be compiled by the State Ethics Commission and transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Upon request, a public official shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual, including a public official or executive-level public employee, who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection.(v) A person that relies in good faith on the list compiled by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to penalty for a violation of this section.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0756PN0796 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." A person applying for a manufacturer license or terminal operator license under this part."Financial interest." Owning or holding, or being deemed to hold, debt or equity securities or other ownership interest or profits interest. The term does not include a debt or equity security, or other ownership interest or profits interest, which is held or deemed to be held in any of the following:(1) A blind trust over which the executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member thereof may not exercise any managerial control or receive income during the tenure of office and the period under subsection (a). The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to blind trusts established prior to the effective date of this section.(2) Securities that are held in a pension plan, profit-sharing plan, individual retirement account, tax-sheltered annuity, a plan established under 26 U.S.C. § 457 (relating to deferred compensation plans of State and local governments and tax-exempt organizations) or a successor provision deferred compensation plan whether qualified or not qualified under 26 U.S.C. (relating to Internal Revenue Code) or any successor provision or other retirement plan that:(i) is not self-directed by the individual; and(ii) is advised by an independent investment adviser who has sole authority to make investment decisions with respect to contributions made by the individual to these plans.(3) A tuition account plan organized and operated under 26 U.S.C. § 529 (relating to qualified tuition programs) that 20250SB0756PN0796 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is not self-directed by the individual.(4) A mutual fund where the interest owned by the mutual fund in a licensed entity does not constitute a controlling interest as defined in this part."Immediate family." A spouse, minor child or unemancipated child."Licensee." A manufacturer licensee or a terminal operator licensee."Party officer." The term shall include the following:(1) a member of a national committee;(2) a chairperson, vice chairperson, secretary, treasurer or counsel of a State committee or member of the executive committee of a State committee;(3) a county chairperson, vice chairperson, counsel, secretary or treasurer of a county committee in which a licensee under this part is located; or(4) a city chairperson, vice chairperson, counsel, secretary or treasurer of a city committee of a city in which a licensee under this part is located."Public official." The term shall include the following:(1) The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, a member of the Governor's Cabinet, State Treasurer, Auditor General and Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(2) A member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the Commonwealth.(3) An individual elected or appointed to an office of a county or municipality that directly receives a distribution of revenue under this part.(4) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental 20250SB0756PN0796 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) that directly receives a distribution of revenue under this part.(5) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority, county, municipality or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with discretionary power that may influence or affect the outcome of an action or decision and who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to a licensed entity or is involved in other matters under this part.§ 6304. Additional restrictions.(a) Restrictions.--(1) No individual trooper or employee of the Pennsylvania State Police or employee of the Office of Attorney General or the department whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to gaming under this part or who has other discretionary authority that may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part may do any of the following:(i) Accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity, for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(ii) (A) Appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in other activity on behalf of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant, licensee or licensed entity, 20250SB0756PN0796 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for a period of two years after termination of employment.(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent a current or former trooper or employee of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General or the department from appearing before the board in a proceeding or hearing as a witness or testifying as to a fact or information.(2) As a condition of employment, a potential employee who would be subject to this subsection shall sign an affidavit that the individual will not accept employment with or be retained by an applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity, for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(b) Employment or retention.--(1) No applicant or licensed entity or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity may employ or retain an individual subject to subsection (a) until the expiration of the period required in subsection (a)(1)(i).(2) An applicant or licensed entity, or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company of an applicant or licensed entity that knowingly employs or retains an individual in violation of this subsection, shall terminate the employment of the individual and be subject to penalty under section 1518(c) (relating to prohibited acts; penalties).(c) Violation.--If an individual subject to subsection (a) refuses or otherwise fails to sign an affidavit, the 20250SB0756PN0796 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual's potential employer shall rescind the offer of employment.(d) Code of conduct.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police, Office of Attorney General and department each shall adopt a comprehensive code of conduct that supplements all other requirements under this part and 65 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to accountability), as applicable, and shall provide guidelines applicable to troopers, employees, independent contractors of the agency whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to skill gaming under this part or who have other discretionary authority that may affect the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this part, and the immediate families of these individuals to enable them to avoid a perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality of skill gaming enforcement and regulation.(2) At a minimum, the code of conduct adopted under this section shall apply the types of restrictions applicable to members under section 1202.1(c) (relating to code of conduct), except that the restrictions under section 1202.1(c)(5) shall not apply to an elected Attorney General.(e) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) (i) Issue a written determination of whether an individual is subject to subsection (a) upon the written request of the individual or the individual's employer or potential employer.(ii) A person that relies in good faith on a 20250SB0756PN0796 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination made under this paragraph shall not be subject to penalty for an action taken, provided that all material facts specified in the request for the determination are correct.(2) (i) Publish a list of all positions within the Pennsylvania State Police, the Office of Attorney General and the department the duties of which would subject the individuals in those positions to the provisions of subsection (a).(ii) Each agency subject to this subsection shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which list shall be compiled by the State Ethics Commission and transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and shall be posted by the board on the board's publicly accessible Internet website and shall be posted by each agency on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Upon request by the State Ethics Commission, members and employees of each agency subject to this subsection shall provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list.(iv) The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection.(v) A person who relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to penalty for a violation of subsection (a).20250SB0756PN0796 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHAPTER 65MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.6501. Funding.6502. Declaration of exemption from Federal laws prohibiting skill gaming terminals.6503. Preemption of local taxes and license fees.6504. Exclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court.§ 6501. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--The General Assembly appropriates the following:(1) The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the board for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to implement and administer the provisions of this part.(2) The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the department for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to prepare for, implement and administer the provisions of this part.(3) The sum of $2,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police for the fiscal period July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, to prepare for, implement and administer the provisions of this part.(b) Repayment required.--The money appropriated under this section shall be repaid to the General Fund by establishment licensees according to subsection (c).(c) Repayment schedule.--Beginning two years from the date the board authorizes the first skill gaming terminal to be connected to the central control computer system and is made available for public use, the department shall collect an 20250SB0756PN0796 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment of .05% of gross terminal revenue on a bimonthly basis from each terminal operator licensee for deposit into the General Fund. The department shall continue to collect the assessment until the amounts under subsection (a) are repaid to the General Fund.(d) Unused amounts.--On July 1, 2026, any portion of amounts appropriated under this section that are unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted as of June 30 of the prior fiscal year shall automatically be transferred to the General Fund.§ 6502. Declaration of exemption from Federal laws prohibiting skill gaming terminals.(a) Declaration.--Under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 24 (relating to transportation of gambling devices), the Commonwealth declares that it is exempt from 15 U.S.C. § 1172 (relating to transportation of gambling devices as unlawful; exceptions; authority of Federal Trade Commission).(b) Legal shipments.--All shipments of gambling devices, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1171 (relating to definitions), into this Commonwealth, the registering, recording and labeling of which has been effected by the manufacturer licensee of those devices in accordance with 15 U.S.C. §§ 1173 (relating to registration of manufacturers and dealers) and 1174 (relating to labeling and marking of shipping packages), shall be deemed legal shipments of gambling devices into this Commonwealth.§ 6503. Preemption of local taxes and license fees.(a) Statutes.--Skill gaming terminals shall be exempt from taxes levied under the following:(1) The act of August 5, 1932 (Sp.Sess., P.L.45, No.45), referred to as the Sterling Act.(2) The act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), 20250SB0756PN0796 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as The Local Tax Enabling Act.(3) 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. III Subpt. E (relating to home rule and optional plan government).(4) Any statute that confers taxing authority to a political subdivision.(b) Licensing fees.--Skill gaming terminals are exempt from local licensing fees.§ 6504. Exclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court.The Pennsylvania Supreme Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear a challenge to or to render a declaratory judgment concerning the constitutionality of this part. The Pennsylvania Supreme Court may take such action as it deems appropriate, consistent with the Pennsylvania Supreme Court retaining jurisdiction over the matter, to find facts or to expedite a final judgment in connection with a challenge or request for declaratory relief.Section 33. Section 5513(a) introductory paragraph and (1) and (e.1) of Title 18 are amended and subsection (f) is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5513. Gambling devices, gambling, etc.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree if [he] the person:(1) intentionally or knowingly makes, assembles, sets up, maintains, sells, lends, leases, gives away, or offers for sale, loan, lease or gift, any [punch board, drawing card, slot machine or any device to be used for gambling purposes, except playing cards] illegal gambling device;* * *[(e.1) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any activity that is lawfully conducted 20250SB0756PN0796 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under any of the following:(1) The act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(2) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(3) The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(4) 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).](f) Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Illegal gambling device." A mechanical, computerized or electrical contrivance, terminal, machine or other device that, upon insertion or payment of cash or cash equivalent, is available to play or operate one or more games, the outcome of which game is determined by any element of chance. The term includes a website, program, software or mobile device application that offers the player the ability to play a game with the outcome being determined by any element of chance. The term shall not include any activity that is lawfully conducted under any of the following:(1) The act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(2) The act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(3) The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(4) 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements).* * *20250SB0756PN0796 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 34. Section 5803(a) of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 5803. Asset forfeiture.(a) Applicability.--Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this section shall apply to forfeitures conducted under the following:* * *(1.1) 4 Pa.C.S. § 5905 (relating to prohibited acts and penalties).* * *Section 35. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate this act.(2) Sections 2501 and 2502 and the phrase "the tax imposed under section 2502 and" in section 2502.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are repealed.Section 36. The following shall apply:(1) The Attorney General or a district attorney may not prosecute a violation under 4 Pa.C.S. Pt. IV:(i) Committed less than 300 days after the effective date of this section by a person that, at the time of the violation, had an application pending before the Gaming Control Board.(ii) Committed less than 450 days after the effective date of this section by a person that is a lottery licensee.(2) The Attorney General or a district attorney may not prosecute a violation under the amendment of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513(a)(1) or (e.1):20250SB0756PN0796 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Committed less than 300 days from the effective date of this section by a person that, at the time of the violation, had an application pending before the Gaming Control Board.(ii) Committed less than 450 days after the effective date of this section by a person that is a lottery licensee.Section 37. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025.20250SB0756PN0796 - 183 - 12345678